Nebraska, session 109, LB295.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 4-108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
4-108 (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, unless exempted
from verification under section 4-110 or pursuant to federal law, no state
agency or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall provide public
benefits to a person not lawfully present in the United States.
(2) Except as provided in section 4-110 or if exempted by federal law,
every agency or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall verify the
lawful presence in the United States of any person who has applied for public
benefits administered by an agency or a political subdivision of the State of
Nebraska. This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion,
gender, ethnicity, or national origin.
(3) No employee of a state agency or political subdivision of the State of
Nebraska shall be authorized to participate in any retirement system,
including, but not limited to, the systems provided for in the Class V School
Employees Retirement Act, the County Employees Retirement Act, the Judges
Retirement Act, the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act, the School Employees
Retirement Act, and the State Employees Retirement Act, unless the employee is
a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United States. The
employing state agency or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska and
the employee shall maintain at least one of the following documents, which
shall be unexpired , if applicable to the particular document or which has an
expiration date that has been extended by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services so
that such document is still valid, to demonstrate United States citizenship or
lawful presence in the United States as of the employee's date of hire and
produce any such document so maintained upon request of the Public Employees
Retirement Board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
-1-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
Public Employees Retirement Board.
Sec. 2. Section 23-2301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
23-2301 For purposes of the County Employees Retirement Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1)(a) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the aggregate
amounts expected to be received under different forms of an annuity payment.
(b) For a member hired prior to January 1, 2018, the mortality assumption
used for purposes of converting the member cash balance account shall be the
1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table using a unisex rate that is fifty percent
male and fifty percent female. For purposes of converting the member cash
balance account attributable to contributions made prior to January 1, 1984,
that were transferred pursuant to the act, the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality
Table for males shall be used.
(c) For a member hired on or after January 1, 2018, or rehired on or after
January 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit or taking a refund of contributions, the mortality assumption used for
purposes of converting the member cash balance account shall be a unisex
mortality table that is recommended by the actuary and approved by the board
following an actuarial experience study, a benefit adequacy study, or a plan
valuation. The mortality table and actuarial factors in effect on the member's
retirement date will be used to calculate the actuarial equivalency of any
retirement benefit;
(2) Annuity means equal monthly payments provided by the retirement system
to a member or beneficiary under forms determined by the board beginning the
first day of the month after an annuity election is received in the office of
the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems or the first day of the month
after the employee's termination of employment, whichever is later. The last
payment shall be at the end of the calendar month in which the member dies or
in accordance with the payment option chosen by the member;
(3) Annuity start date means the date upon which a member's annuity is
first effective and shall be the first day of the month following the member's
termination or following the date the application is received by the board,
whichever is later;
(4) Cash balance benefit means a member's retirement benefit that is equal
to an amount based on annual employee contribution credits plus interest
credits and, if vested, employer contribution credits plus interest credits and
dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section
23-2317;
(5)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the member
for personal services performed during the plan year. Compensation does not
include insurance premiums converted into cash payments, reimbursement for
expenses incurred, fringe benefits, per diems, or bonuses for services not
actually rendered, including, but not limited to, early retirement inducements,
cash awards, and severance pay, except for retroactive salary payments paid
pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and grievance settlements.
Compensation includes overtime pay, member retirement contributions, and
amounts contributed by the member to plans under sections 125, 403(b), and 457
of the Internal Revenue Code or any other section of the code which defers or
excludes such amounts from income.
(b) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be disregarded. For an employee who was
a member of the retirement system before the first plan year beginning after
December 31, 1995, the limitation on compensation shall not be less than the
amount which was allowed to be taken into account under the retirement system
as in effect on July 1, 1993;
(6) Date of adoption of the retirement system by each county means the
first day of the month next following the date of approval of the retirement
system by the county board or January 1, 1987, whichever is earlier;
(7) Date of disability means the date on which a member is determined by
the board to be disabled;
(8) Defined contribution benefit means a member's retirement benefit from
a money purchase plan in which member benefits equal annual contributions and
earnings pursuant to section 23-2309 and, if vested, employer contributions and
earnings pursuant to section 23-2310;
(9) Disability means an inability to engage in any substantially gainful
activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment
which was initially diagnosed or became disabling while the member was an
active participant in the plan and which can be expected to result in death or
be of a long-continued and indefinite duration;
(10) Employee means all persons or officers who are employed by a county
of the State of Nebraska on a permanent basis, persons or officers employed by
or serving in a municipal county formed by at least one county participating in
the retirement system, persons employed as provided in section 2-1608, all
elected officers of a county, and such other persons or officers as are
classified from time to time as permanent employees by the county board of the
county by which they are employed, except that employee does not include
judges, employees or officers of any county having a population in excess of
two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
-2-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
decennial census, or, except as provided in section 23-2306, persons making
contributions to the School Employees Retirement System of the State of
Nebraska;
(11) Employee contribution credit means an amount equal to the member
contribution amount required by section 23-2307;
(12) Employer contribution credit means an amount equal to the employer
contribution amount required by section 23-2308;
(13) Final account value means the value of a member's account on the date
the account is either distributed to the member or used to purchase an annuity
from the plan, which date shall occur as soon as administratively practicable
after receipt of a valid application for benefits, but no sooner than forty-
five days after the member's termination;
(14) Five-year break in service means a period of five consecutive one-
year breaks in service;
(15) Full-time employee means an employee who is employed to work one-half
or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period;
(16) Future service means service following the date of adoption of the
retirement system;
(17) Guaranteed investment contract means an investment contract or
account offering a return of principal invested plus interest at a specified
rate. For investments made after July 19, 1996, guaranteed investment contract
does not include direct obligations of the United States or its
instrumentalities, bonds, participation certificates or other obligations of
the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage
Corporation, or the Government National Mortgage Association, or collateralized
mortgage obligations and other derivative securities. This subdivision shall
not be construed to require the liquidation of investment contracts or accounts
entered into prior to July 19, 1996;
(18) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(19) Interest credit rate means the greater of (a) five percent or (b) the
applicable federal mid-term rate, as published by the Internal Revenue Service
as of the first day of the calendar quarter for which interest credits are
credited, plus one and one-half percent, such rate to be compounded annually;
(20) Interest credits means the amounts credited to the employee cash
balance account and the employer cash balance account at the end of each day.
Such interest credit for each account shall be determined by applying the daily
portion of the interest credit rate to the account balance at the end of the
previous day. Such interest credits shall continue to be credited to the
employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance account after a
member ceases to be an employee, except that no such credit shall be made with
respect to the employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance
account for any day beginning on or after the member's date of final account
value. If benefits payable to the member's surviving spouse or beneficiary are
delayed after the member's death, interest credits shall continue to be
credited to the employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance
account until such surviving spouse or beneficiary commences receipt of a
distribution from the plan;
(21) Member cash balance account means an account equal to the sum of the
employee cash balance account and, if vested, the employer cash balance account
and dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section
23-2317;
(22) One-year break in service means a plan year during which the member
has not completed more than five hundred hours of service;
(23) Participation means qualifying for and making the required deposits
to the retirement system during the course of a plan year;
(24) Part-time employee means an employee who is employed to work less
than one-half of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period;
(25) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on January 1 and
ending on December 31;
(26) Prior service means service prior to the date of adoption of the
retirement system;
(27) Regular interest means the rate of interest earned each calendar year
as determined by the retirement board in conformity with actual and expected
earnings on the investments through December 31, 1985;
(28) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the deferral of
distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions pursuant to
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued
thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the plan;
and
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a member
who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who attained
seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020, and prior to
January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who attained
seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-three years of
age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who attained
seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the plan;
and
-3-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(29) Required contribution means the deduction to be made from the
compensation of employees as provided in the act;
(30) Retirement means qualifying for and accepting the retirement benefit
granted under the act after terminating employment;
(31) Retirement application means the form approved and provided by the
retirement system for acceptance of a member's request for either regular or
disability retirement;
(32) Retirement board or board means the Public Employees Retirement
Board;
(33) Retirement date means (a) the first day of the month following the
date upon which a member's request for retirement is received on a retirement
application if the member is eligible for retirement and has terminated
employment or (b) the first day of the month following termination of
employment if the member is eligible for retirement and has filed an
application but has not yet terminated employment;
(34) Retirement system means the Retirement System for Nebraska Counties;
(35) Service means the actual total length of employment as an employee
and is not deemed to be interrupted by (a) temporary or seasonal suspension of
service that does not terminate the employee's employment, (b) leave of absence
authorized by the employer for a period not exceeding twelve months, (c) leave
of absence because of disability, or (d) military service, when properly
authorized by the retirement board. Service does not include any period of
disability for which disability retirement benefits are received under section
23-2315;
(36) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the member on the
date of the member's death or (b) the spouse or former spouse of the member if
survivorship rights are provided under a qualified domestic relations order
filed with the board pursuant to the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The spouse or
former spouse shall supersede the spouse married to the member on the date of
the member's death as provided under a qualified domestic relations order. If
the benefits payable to the spouse or former spouse under a qualified domestic
relations order are less than the value of benefits entitled to the surviving
spouse, the spouse married to the member on the date of the member's death
shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of the benefits;
(37)(a) (37) Termination of employment occurs on the date on which a
county which is a member of the retirement system determines that its employer-
employee relationship with an employee is dissolved. The county shall notify
the board of the date on which such a termination has occurred.
(b) Termination of employment does not occur if an employee whose
employer-employee relationship with a county is dissolved enters into an
employer-employee relationship with the same or another county which
participates in the Retirement System for Nebraska Counties and there are less
than one hundred twenty days between the date when the employee's employer-
employee relationship ceased with the county and the date when the employer-
employee relationship commenced with the same or another county which qualifies
the employee for participation in the plan.
(c) It is the responsibility of the employer that is involved in the
termination of employment to notify the board of such change in employment and
provide the board with such information as the board deems necessary.
(d) If the board determines that termination of employment has not
occurred and a retirement benefit has been paid to a member of the retirement
system pursuant to section 23-2319, the board shall require the member who has
received such benefit to repay the benefit to the retirement system unless the
board determines that all or any portion of such benefit was the result of an
inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such benefit would create a
significant hardship; and
(38) Vesting credit means credit for years, or a fraction of a year, of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan for purposes of determining
vesting of the employer account.
Sec. 3. Section 23-2306, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
23-2306 (1) The membership of the retirement system shall be composed of
all persons who are or were employed by member counties and who maintain an
account balance with the retirement system.
(2) The following employees of member counties are authorized to
participate in the retirement system: (a) All permanent full-time employees who
have attained the age of eighteen years shall begin participation in the
retirement system upon employment and full-time elected officials shall begin
participation in the retirement system upon taking office, (b) all permanent
part-time employees who have attained the age of eighteen years may exercise
the option to begin participation in the retirement system within the first
thirty days of employment, and (c) all part-time elected officials may exercise
the option to begin participation in the retirement system within thirty days
after taking office. An employee who exercises the option to begin
participation in the retirement system shall remain in the system until
termination or retirement, regardless of any change of status as a permanent or
temporary employee.
(3) No employee of a member county shall be authorized to participate in
the retirement system provided for in the County Employees Retirement Act
unless the employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the
United States. The employing member county and the employee shall maintain at
-4-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
least one of the following documents, which shall be unexpired , if applicable
to the particular document or which has an expiration date that has been
extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security or the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services so that such document is still
valid, to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the
United States as of the employee's date of hire and produce any such document
so maintained upon request of the retirement board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
retirement board.
(4)(a) The board may determine that a governmental entity currently
participating in the retirement system no longer qualifies, in whole or in
part, under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code as a participating
employer in a governmental plan.
(b)(i) To aid governmental entities in their business decisionmaking
process, any governmental entity currently participating in the retirement
system contemplating a business transaction that may result in such entity no
longer qualifying, in whole or in part, under section 414(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code may notify the board in writing as soon as reasonably practicable,
but no later than one hundred eighty days before the transaction is to occur.
(ii) The board when timely notified shall, as soon as is reasonably
practicable, obtain from its contracted actuary the cost of any actuarial study
necessary to determine the potential funding obligation. The board shall notify
the entity of such cost.
(iii) If such entity pays the board's contracted actuary pursuant to
subdivision (4)(c)(vi) of this section for any actuarial study necessary to
determine the potential funding obligation, the board shall, as soon as
reasonably practicable following its receipt of the actuarial study, (A)
determine whether the entity's contemplated business transaction will cause the
entity to no longer qualify under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code,
(B) determine whether the contemplated business transaction constitutes a plan
termination by the entity, (C) determine the potential funding obligation, (D)
determine the administrative costs that will be incurred by the board or the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's
removal from the retirement system, and (E) notify the entity of such
determinations.
(iv) Failure to timely notify the board pursuant to subdivision (4)(b)(i)
of this section may result in the entity being treated as though the board made
a decision pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
(c) If the board makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of
this section, or if the entity engages in the contemplated business transaction
reviewed under subdivision (4)(b) of this section that results in the entity no
longer qualifying under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) The board shall notify the entity that it no longer qualifies under
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code within ten business days after the
determination;
(ii) The affected plan members shall be immediately considered fully
vested;
(iii) The affected plan members shall become inactive within ninety days
after the board's determination;
(iv) The entity shall pay to the County Employees Retirement Fund an
amount equal to any funding obligation;
(v) The entity shall pay to the County Employees Cash Balance Retirement
Expense Fund an amount equal to any administrative costs incurred by the board
or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems in connection with the
entity's removal from the retirement system; and
(vi) The entity shall pay directly to the board's contracted actuary an
amount equal to the cost of any actuarial study necessary to aid the board in
determining the amount of such funding obligation, if not previously paid.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Business transaction means a merger; consolidation; sale of assets,
equipment, or facilities; termination of a division, department, section, or
subgroup of the entity; or any other business transaction that results in
termination of some or all of the entity's workforce; and
(ii) Funding obligation means the financial liability of the retirement
-5-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
system to provide benefits for the affected plan members incurred by the
retirement system due to the entity's business transaction calculated using the
methodology and assumptions recommended by the board's contracted actuary and
approved by the board. The methodology and assumptions used must be structured
in a way that ensures the entity is financially liable for all the costs of the
entity's business transaction, and the retirement system is not financially
liable for any of the cost of the entity's business transaction.
(e) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
this subsection including, but not limited to, the methods of notifying the
board of pending business transactions, the acceptable methods of payment, and
the timing of such payment.
(5) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a full-time
employee may apply to the board for vesting credit for years of participation
in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by section 414(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code. During the years of participation in the other Nebraska
governmental plan, the employee must have been a full-time employee, as defined
in the Nebraska governmental plan in which the credit was earned. The board may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the assessment and
granting of vesting credit.
(6) Any employee who qualifies for membership in the retirement system
pursuant to this section may not be disqualified from membership in the
retirement system solely because such employee also maintains separate
employment which qualifies the employee for membership in another public
retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement system disqualify such
an employee from membership in another public retirement system solely by
reason of separate employment which qualifies such employee for membership in
this retirement system.
(7) A full-time or part-time employee of a city, village, or township who
becomes a county employee pursuant to a merger of services shall receive
vesting credit for his or her years of participation in a Nebraska governmental
plan, as defined by section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the city,
village, or township.
(8) A full-time or part-time employee of a city, village, fire protection
district, or township who becomes a municipal county employee shall receive
credit for his or her years of employment with the city, village, fire
protection district, or township for purposes of the vesting provisions of this
section.
(9) A full-time or part-time employee of the state who becomes a county
employee pursuant to transfer of assessment function to a county shall not be
deemed to have experienced a termination of employment and shall receive
vesting credit for his or her years of participation in the State Employees
Retirement System of the State of Nebraska.
(10) Counties shall ensure that employees authorized to participate in the
retirement system pursuant to this section shall enroll and make required
contributions to the retirement system immediately upon becoming an employee.
Information necessary to determine membership in the retirement system shall be
provided by the employer.
Sec. 4. Section 23-2320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-2320 (1) Prior to January 1, 2020, except as otherwise provided in this
section, a member of the retirement system who has a five-year break in service
shall upon reemployment be considered a new employee with respect to the County
Employees Retirement Act and shall not receive credit for service prior to his
or her reemployment date.
(2)(a) A member who ceases to be an employee before becoming eligible for
retirement under section 23-2315 and again becomes a permanent full-time or
permanent part-time county employee prior to having a five-year break in
service shall immediately be reenrolled in the retirement system and resume
making contributions. For purposes of vesting employer contributions made prior
to and after the reentry into the retirement system under subsection (3) of
section 23-2319, years of participation include years of participation prior to
such employee's original termination. For a member who is not vested and has
received a termination benefit pursuant to section 23-2319, the years of
participation prior to such employee's original termination shall be limited in
a ratio equal to the amount that the member repays divided by the termination
benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 23-2319.
(b) The reemployed member may repay the value of, or a portion of the
value of, the termination benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 23-2319. A
reemployed member who elects to repay all or a portion of the value of the
termination benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 23-2319 shall repay the
actual earnings on such value. Repayment of the termination benefit shall
commence within three years of reemployment and shall be completed within five
years of reemployment or prior to termination of employment, whichever occurs
first, through (i) direct payments to the retirement system, (ii) installment
payments made pursuant to a binding irrevocable payroll deduction authorization
made by the member, (iii) an eligible rollover distribution as provided under
the Internal Revenue Code, or (iv) a direct rollover distribution made in
accordance with section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) The value of the member's forfeited employer account or employer cash
balance account, as of the date of forfeiture, shall be restored in a ratio
equal to the amount of the benefit that the member has repaid divided by the
termination benefit received. The employer account or employer cash balance
account shall be restored first out of the current forfeiture amounts and then
-6-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
by additional employer contributions.
(3) For a member who retired pursuant to section 23-2315 and becomes a
permanent full-time employee or permanent part-time employee with a county
under the County Employees Retirement Act more than one hundred twenty days
after his or her retirement date, the member shall continue receiving
retirement benefits. Such a retired member or a retired member who received a
lump-sum distribution of his or her benefit shall be considered a new employee
as of the date of reemployment and shall not receive credit for any service
prior to the member's retirement for purposes of the act.
(4) A member who is reinstated as an employee pursuant to a grievance or
appeal of his or her termination by the county shall be a member upon
reemployment and shall not be considered to have a break in service for such
period of time that the grievance or appeal was pending.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2020, if a contributing member of the retirement
system ceases to be an employee and returns to service in any capacity with any
county under the County Employees Retirement Act prior to having a one-hundred-
twenty-day break in service, the member:
(a) Shall not be deemed to have had a bona fide separation of service;
(b) Shall be immediately reenrolled in:
(i) The defined contribution benefit if the member was contributing to the
defined contribution benefit prior to ceasing employment; or
(ii) The cash balance benefit in which the member was participating prior
to ceasing employment if the member was contributing to the cash balance
benefit prior to ceasing employment;
(c) Shall immediately resume making contributions;
(d) Shall make up any missed contributions based upon services rendered
and compensation received;
(e) Shall have all distributions from the retirement system canceled; and
(f) Shall repay the gross distributions from the retirement system unless
the board determines that all or any portion of such gross distributions were
the result of an inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such gross
distributions would create a significant hardship.
(6)(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, if a contributing member of the
retirement system ceases to be an employee and returns to permanent full-time
or permanent part-time service in any capacity with any county under the County
Employees Retirement Act after having a one-hundred-twenty-day break in
service, the member:
(i) Shall be immediately reenrolled in:
(A) The defined contribution benefit if the member was contributing to the
defined contribution benefit prior to ceasing employment; or
(B) The cash balance benefit in which the member was participating prior
to ceasing employment if the member was contributing to the cash balance
benefit prior to ceasing employment;
(ii) Shall immediately resume making contributions;
(iii) Shall continue receiving any annuity elected after the member ceased
employment and before the member was reemployed; and
(iv) Shall be prohibited from taking any distributions from the retirement
system until the employee again terminates employment with any and all counties
under the County Employees Retirement Act.
(b) For the purposes of vesting employer contributions made prior to and
after reentry into the retirement system, the member's years of participation
prior to the date the member originally ceased employment and the years of
participation after the member is reenrolled in the retirement system shall be
included as years of participation, except that if the member is not vested on
the date the member originally ceased employment and has taken a distribution,
the years of participation prior to the date the member originally ceased
employment shall be limited in a ratio equal to the value of the distribution
that the member repays divided by the total value of the distribution taken as
described in subdivision (6)(c) of this section.
(c) A reemployed member may repay all or a portion of the value of a
distribution except for an annuity elected after the member ceased employment
and before the member was reemployed. Repayment of such a distribution shall
commence within three years after reemployment and shall be completed within
five years after reemployment or prior to the member again ceasing employment,
whichever occurs first, through (i) direct payments to the retirement system,
(ii) installment payments made pursuant to a binding irrevocable payroll
deduction authorization made by the member, (iii) an eligible rollover
distribution as provided under the Internal Revenue Code, or (iv) a direct
rollover distribution made in accordance with section 401(a)(31) of the
Internal Revenue Code. If the member fails to repay all of the value of such a
distribution prior to the member again ceasing employment, the member shall be
forever barred from repaying the value of such a distribution taken between the
periods of employment. The value of the member's forfeited employer account or
employer cash balance account, as of the date of forfeiture, shall be restored
in a ratio equal to the amount of the distribution repaid by the member divided
by the amount of the distribution taken. The employer account or employer cash
balance account shall be restored first out of the current forfeiture amounts
and then by additional employer contributions.
Sec. 5. Section 24-701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
24-701 For purposes of the Judges Retirement Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1)(a) Actuarial equivalence means the equality in value of the aggregate
-7-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
amounts expected to be received under different forms of payment.
(b) For a judge hired prior to July 1, 2017, the determinations are to be
based on the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table reflecting sex-distinct factors
blended using seventy-five percent of the male table and twenty-five percent of
the female table. An interest rate of eight percent per annum shall be
reflected in making these determinations.
(c) For a judge hired on or after July 1, 2017, or rehired on or after
July 1, 2017, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit, the determinations shall be based on a unisex mortality table and an
interest rate specified by the board. Both the mortality table and the interest
rate shall be recommended by the actuary and approved by the board following an
actuarial experience study, a benefit adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The
mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial factors in effect on the judge's
retirement date will be used to calculate actuarial equivalency of any
retirement benefit. Such interest rate may be, but is not required to be, equal
to the assumed rate of return;
(2) Beneficiary means a person so designated by a judge in the last
designation of beneficiary on file with the board or, if no designated person
survives or if no designation is on file, the estate of such judge;
(3) Board means the Public Employees Retirement Board;
(4)(a) Compensation means the statutory salary of a judge or the salary
being received by such judge pursuant to law. Compensation does not include
compensation for unused sick leave or unused vacation leave converted to cash
payments, insurance premiums converted into cash payments, reimbursement for
expenses incurred, fringe benefits, per diems, or bonuses for services not
actually rendered, including, but not limited to, early retirement inducements,
cash awards, and severance pay, except for retroactive salary payments paid
pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and grievance settlements.
Compensation includes overtime pay, member retirement contributions, and
amounts contributed by the member to plans under sections 125 and 457 of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 or any other section of
the code which defers or excludes such amounts from income.
(b) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 shall be
disregarded. For an employee who was a member of the retirement system before
the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995, the limitation on
compensation shall not be less than the amount which was allowed to be taken
into account under the retirement system as in effect on July 1, 1993;
(5) Creditable service means the total number of years served as a judge,
including prior service, military service, and current service, computed to the
nearest one-twelfth year. For current service prior to the time that the member
has contributed the required percentage of salary until the maximum benefit as
limited by section 24-710 has been earned, creditable service does not include
current service for which member contributions are not made or are withdrawn
and not repaid;
(6) Current benefit means the initial benefit increased by all adjustments
made pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act;
(7)(a) Current service means the period of service (i) any judge of the
Supreme Court or judge of the district court serves in such capacity from and
after January 3, 1957, (ii)(A) any judge of the Nebraska Workmen's Compensation
Court served in such capacity from and after September 20, 1957, and prior to
July 17, 1986, and (B) any judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court
serves in such capacity on and after July 17, 1986, (iii) any county judge
serves in such capacity from and after January 5, 1961, (iv) any judge of a
separate juvenile court serves in such capacity, (v) any judge of the municipal
court served in such capacity subsequent to October 23, 1967, and prior to July
1, 1985, (vi) any judge of the county court or associate county judge serves in
such capacity subsequent to January 4, 1973, (vii) any clerk magistrate, who
was an associate county judge and a member of the fund at the time of
appointment as a clerk magistrate, serves in such capacity from and after July
1, 1986, and (viii) any judge of the Court of Appeals serves in such capacity
on or after September 6, 1991.
(b) Current service shall not be deemed to be interrupted by (i) temporary
or seasonal suspension of service that does not terminate the employee's
employment, (ii) leave of absence authorized by the employer for a period not
exceeding twelve months, (iii) leave of absence because of disability, or (iv)
military service, when properly authorized by the board. Current service does
not include any period of disability for which disability retirement benefits
are received under section 24-709;
(8) Final average compensation for a judge who becomes a member prior to
July 1, 2015, means the average monthly compensation for the three twelve-month
periods of service as a judge in which compensation was the greatest or, in the
event of a judge serving less than three twelve-month periods, the average
monthly compensation for such judge's period of service. Final average
compensation for a judge who becomes a member on and after July 1, 2015, means
the average monthly compensation for the five twelve-month periods of service
as a judge in which compensation was the greatest or, in the event of a judge
serving less than five twelve-month periods, the average monthly compensation
for such judge's period of service;
(9) Fund means the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges;
(10) Future member means a judge who first served as a judge on or after
December 25, 1969, or means a judge who first served as a judge prior to
December 25, 1969, who elects to become a future member on or before June 30,
-8-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
1970, as provided in section 24-710.01;
(11) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(12) Initial benefit means the retirement benefit calculated at the time
of retirement;
(13) Judge means and includes (a) all duly elected or appointed Chief
Justices or judges of the Supreme Court and judges of the district courts of
Nebraska who serve in such capacity on and after January 3, 1957, (b)(i) all
duly appointed judges of the Nebraska Workmen's Compensation Court who served
in such capacity on and after September 20, 1957, and prior to July 17, 1986,
and (ii) judges of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court who serve in such
capacity on and after July 17, 1986, (c) judges of separate juvenile courts,
(d) judges of the county courts of the respective counties who serve in such
capacity on and after January 5, 1961, (e) judges of the county court and clerk
magistrates who were associate county judges and members of the fund at the
time of their appointment as clerk magistrates, (f) judges of municipal courts
established by Chapter 26, article 1, who served in such capacity on and after
October 23, 1967, and prior to July 1, 1985, and (g) judges of the Court of
Appeals;
(14) Member means a judge eligible to participate in the retirement system
established under the Judges Retirement Act;
(15) Normal form annuity means a series of equal monthly payments payable
at the end of each calendar month during the life of a retired judge as
provided in sections 24-707 and 24-710, except as provided in section 42-1107.
The first payment shall include all amounts accrued since the effective date of
the award of the annuity. The last payment shall be at the end of the calendar
month in which such judge dies. If at the time of death the amount of annuity
payments such judge has received is less than contributions to the fund made by
such judge, plus regular interest, the difference shall be paid to the
beneficiary or estate;
(16) Normal retirement date means the first day of the month following
attainment of age sixty-five;
(17) Original member means a judge who first served as a judge prior to
December 25, 1969, who does not elect to become a future member pursuant to
section 24-710.01, and who was retired on or before December 31, 1992;
(18) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on July 1 and
ending on June 30 of the following year;
(19) Prior service means all the periods of time any person has served as
a (a) judge of the Supreme Court or judge of the district court prior to
January 3, 1957, (b) judge of the county court prior to January 5, 1961, (c)
judge of the Nebraska Workmen's Compensation Court prior to September 20, 1957,
(d) judge of the separate juvenile court, or (e) judge of the municipal court
prior to October 23, 1967;
(20) Regular interest means interest fixed at a rate equal to the daily
treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities, as published by the
Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that applies on July 1 of each
year, which may be credited monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually as
the board may direct;
(21) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the deferral of
distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions pursuant to
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued
thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a member
who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who attained
seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020, and prior to
January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who attained
seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-three years of
age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who attained
seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(22) Retirement application means the form approved and provided by the
retirement system for acceptance of a member's request for either regular or
disability retirement;
(23) Retirement date means (a) the first day of the month following the
date upon which a member's request for retirement is received on a retirement
application if the member is eligible for retirement and has terminated
employment or (b) the first day of the month following termination of
employment if the member is eligible for retirement and has filed an
application but has not yet terminated employment;
(24) Retirement system or system means the Nebraska Judges Retirement
System as provided in the Judges Retirement Act;
(25) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the member on the
date of the member's death or (b) the spouse or former spouse of the member if
survivorship rights are provided under a qualified domestic relations order
filed with the board pursuant to the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The spouse or
former spouse shall supersede the spouse married to the member on the date of
the member's death as provided under a qualified domestic relations order. If
-9-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
the benefits payable to the spouse or former spouse under the qualified
domestic relations order are less than the value of benefits entitled to the
surviving spouse, the spouse married to the member on the date of the member's
death shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of the benefits; and
(26)(a) (26) Termination of employment occurs on the date on which the
State Court Administrator's office determines that the judge's employer-
employee relationship with the State of Nebraska is dissolved. The State Court
Administrator's office shall notify the board of the date on which such a
termination has occurred.
(b) Termination of employment does not include ceasing employment as a
judge if the judge returns to regular employment as a judge or is employed on a
regular basis by another agency of the State of Nebraska and there are less
than one hundred twenty days between the date when the judge's employer-
employee relationship ceased and the date when the employer-employee
relationship recommences.
(c) It is the responsibility of the employer that is involved in the
termination of employment to notify the board of such change in employment and
provide the board with such information as the board deems necessary.
(d) If the board determines that termination of employment has not
occurred and a retirement benefit has been paid to a member of the retirement
system pursuant to section 24-710, the board shall require the member who has
received such benefit to repay the benefit to the retirement system unless the
board determines that all or any portion of such benefit was the result of an
inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such benefit would create a
significant hardship.
Sec. 6. Section 24-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
24-703 (1) Each original member shall contribute monthly four percent of
his or her monthly compensation to the fund until the maximum benefit as
limited in subsection (1) of section 24-710 has been earned. It shall be the
duty of the Director of Administrative Services in accordance with subsection
(7) of this section to make a deduction of four percent on the monthly payroll
of each original member who is a judge of the Supreme Court, a judge of the
Court of Appeals, a judge of the district court, a judge of a separate juvenile
court, a judge of the county court, a clerk magistrate of the county court who
was an associate county judge and a member of the fund at the time of his or
her appointment as a clerk magistrate, or a judge of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court showing the amount to be deducted and its credit to the
fund. The Director of Administrative Services and the State Treasurer shall
credit the four percent as shown on the payroll and the amounts received from
the various counties to the fund and remit the same to the director in charge
of the judges retirement system who shall keep an accurate record of the
contributions of each judge.
(2)(a) In addition to the contribution required under subdivision (c) of
this subsection, beginning on July 1, 2004, each future member who became a
member prior to July 1, 2015, and who has not elected to make contributions and
receive benefits as provided in section 24-703.03 shall contribute monthly six
percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund until the maximum
benefit as limited in subsection (2) of section 24-710 has been earned. After
the maximum benefit as limited in subsection (2) of section 24-710 has been
earned, such future member shall make no further contributions to the fund,
except that (i) any time the maximum benefit is changed, a future member who
has previously earned the maximum benefit as it existed prior to the change
shall contribute monthly six percent of his or her monthly compensation to the
fund until the maximum benefit as changed and as limited in subsection (2) of
section 24-710 has been earned and (ii) such future member shall continue to
make the contribution required under subdivision (c) of this subsection.
(b) In addition to the contribution required under subdivision (c) of this
subsection, beginning on July 1, 2004, a judge who became a member prior to
July 1, 2015, and who first serves as a judge on or after July 1, 2004, or a
future member who became a member prior to July 1, 2015, and who elects to make
contributions and receive benefits as provided in section 24-703.03 shall
contribute monthly eight percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund
until the maximum benefit as limited by subsection (2) of section 24-710 has
been earned. In addition to the contribution required under subdivision (c) of
this subsection, after the maximum benefit as limited in subsection (2) of
section 24-710 has been earned, such judge or future member shall contribute
monthly four percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund for the
remainder of his or her active service.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2009, a member or judge described in subdivisions
(a) and (b) of this subsection shall contribute monthly an additional one
percent of his or her monthly compensation to the fund.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2015, a judge who first serves as a judge on or
after such date shall contribute monthly ten percent of his or her monthly
compensation to the fund.
(e) It shall be the duty of the Director of Administrative Services to
make a deduction on the monthly payroll of each such future member who is a
judge of the Supreme Court, a judge of the Court of Appeals, a judge of the
district court, a judge of a separate juvenile court, a judge of the county
court, a clerk magistrate of the county court who was an associate county judge
and a member of the fund at the time of his or her appointment as a clerk
magistrate, or a judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court showing the
amount to be deducted and its credit to the fund. This shall be done each
-10-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
month. The Director of Administrative Services and the State Treasurer shall
credit the amount as shown on the payroll and the amounts received from the
various counties to the fund and remit the same to the director in charge of
the judges retirement system who shall keep an accurate record of the
contributions of each judge.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a Nebraska
Retirement Fund for Judges fee of six dollars through June 30, 2021, eight
dollars beginning July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, nine dollars beginning
July 1, 2022, through June 30, 2023, ten dollars beginning July 1, 2023,
through June 30, 2024, eleven dollars beginning July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025, and twelve dollars beginning July 1, 2025, shall be taxed as costs in
each (i) civil cause of action, criminal cause of action, traffic misdemeanor
or infraction, and city or village ordinance violation filed in the district
courts, the county courts, and the separate juvenile courts, (ii) filing in the
district court of an order, award, or judgment of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court or any judge thereof pursuant to section 48-188, (iii)
appeal or other proceeding filed in the Court of Appeals, and (iv) original
action, appeal, or other proceeding filed in the Supreme Court. In county
courts a sum shall be charged which is equal to ten percent of each fee
provided by sections 33-125, 33-126.02, 33-126.03, and 33-126.06, rounded to
the nearest even dollar. No judges retirement fee shall be charged for filing a
report pursuant to sections 33-126.02 and 33-126.06.
(b) The fee increases described in subdivision (a) of this subsection
shall not be taxed as a cost in any criminal cause of action, traffic
misdemeanor or infraction, or city or village ordinance violation filed in the
district court or the county court. The fee on such criminal causes of action,
traffic misdemeanors or infractions, or city or village ordinance violations
shall remain six dollars on and after July 1, 2021.
(c) When collected by the clerk of the district or county court, such fees
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer within ten days after the close of
each calendar month for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges. In
addition, information regarding collection of court fees shall be submitted to
the director in charge of the judges retirement system by the State Court
Administrator within ten days after the close of each calendar month.
(d) The board may charge a late administrative processing fee not to
exceed twenty-five dollars if the information is not timely received or the
money is delinquent. In addition, the board may charge a late fee of thirty-
eight thousandths of one percent of the amount required to be submitted
pursuant to this section for each day such amount has not been received. Such
late fees shall be remitted to the director who shall promptly thereafter remit
such fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.
(e) No Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges fee which is uncollectible for
any reason shall be waived by a county judge as provided in section 29-2709.
(4) All expenditures from the fund shall be authorized by voucher in the
manner prescribed in section 24-713. The fund shall be used for the payment of
all annuities and other benefits to members and their beneficiaries and for the
expenses of administration.
(5)(a) Prior to July 1, 2021:
(i) Beginning July 1, 2013, and each fiscal year thereafter, the board
shall cause an annual actuarial valuation to be performed that will value the
plan assets for the year and ascertain the contributions required for such
fiscal year. The actuary for the board shall perform an actuarial valuation of
the system on the basis of actuarial assumptions recommended by the actuary,
approved by the board, and kept on file with the board using the entry age
actuarial cost method. Under this method, the actuarially required funding rate
is equal to the normal cost rate, plus the contribution rate necessary to
amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability on a level percentage of
salary basis. The normal cost under this method shall be determined for each
individual member on a level percentage of salary basis. The normal cost amount
is then summed for all members;
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2006, any existing unfunded liabilities shall be
reinitialized and amortized over a thirty-year period, and during each
subsequent actuarial valuation through June 30, 2021, changes in the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability due to changes in benefits, actuarial assumptions,
the asset valuation method, or actuarial gains or losses shall be measured and
amortized over a thirty-year period beginning on the valuation date of such
change;
(iii) If the unfunded actuarial accrued liability under the entry age
actuarial cost method is zero or less than zero on an actuarial valuation date,
then all prior unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities shall be considered fully
funded and the unfunded actuarial accrued liability shall be reinitialized and
amortized over a thirty-year period as of the actuarial valuation date; and
(iv) If the actuarially required contribution rate exceeds the rate of all
contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act, there shall be a
supplemental appropriation sufficient to pay for the differences between the
actuarially required contribution rate and the rate of all contributions
required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, and each fiscal year thereafter:
(i) The board shall cause an annual actuarial valuation to be performed
that will value the plan assets for the year and ascertain the contributions
required for such fiscal year. The actuary for the board shall perform an
actuarial valuation of the system on the basis of actuarial assumptions
recommended by the actuary, approved by the board, and kept on file with the
-11-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
board using the entry age actuarial cost method. Under such method, the
actuarially required funding rate is equal to the normal cost rate, plus the
contribution rate necessary to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability on a level percentage of salary basis. The normal cost under such
method shall be determined for each individual member on a level percentage of
salary basis. The normal cost amount is then summed for all members;
(ii) Any changes in the unfunded actuarial accrued liability due to
changes in benefits, actuarial assumptions, the asset valuation method, or
actuarial gains or losses shall be measured and amortized over a twenty-five-
year period beginning on the valuation date of such change;
(iii) If the unfunded actuarial accrued liability under the entry age
actuarial cost method is zero or less than zero on an actuarial valuation date,
then all prior unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities shall be considered fully
funded and the unfunded actuarial accrued liability shall be reinitialized and
amortized over a twenty-five-year period as of the actuarial valuation date;
and
(iv) If the actuarially required contribution rate exceeds the rate of all
contributions required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act, there shall be a
supplemental appropriation sufficient to pay for the differences between the
actuarially required contribution rate and the rate of all contributions
required pursuant to the act.
(c) Upon the recommendation of the actuary to the board, and after the
board notifies the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature,
the board may combine or offset certain amortization bases to reduce future
volatility of the actuarial contribution rate. Such notification to the
committee shall be in writing and include, at a minimum, the actuary's
projection of the contributions to fund the plan if the combination or offset
were not implemented, the actuary's projection of the contributions to fund the
plan if the combination or offset were implemented, and the actuary's
explanation of why the combination or offset is in the best interests of the
plan at the proposed time.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the rate of all contributions
required pursuant to the Judges Retirement Act includes (i) member
contributions, (ii) state contributions pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section which shall be considered as a contribution for the plan year ending
the prior June 30, (iii) court fees as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, and (iv) all fees pursuant to sections 25-2804, 33-103, 33-103.01,
33-106.02, 33-123, 33-124, 33-125, 33-126.02, 33-126.03, and 33-126.06, as
directed to be remitted to the fund.
(6)(a) In addition to the contributions otherwise required by this
section, beginning July 1, 2023, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, the
state shall contribute or as soon thereafter as administratively possible, the
State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the Nebraska Retirement
Fund for Judges an amount equal to five percent of the total annual
compensation of all members of the retirement system except as otherwise
provided in this subsection and as such rate shall be adjusted or terminated by
the Legislature. No adjustment may cause the total contribution rate
established in this subsection to exceed five percent. For purposes of this
subsection, (i) total annual compensation is based on the total member
compensation reported in the most recent annual actuarial valuation report for
the retirement system produced for the board pursuant to section 84-1503 and
(ii) the contribution described in this subsection shall be considered as a
contribution for the plan year ending the prior June 30.
(b) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets is at or above
one hundred percent for two consecutive years as reported in the annual
actuarial valuation report, the actuary shall assess whether the percentage of
the state contribution rate should be adjusted based on projected annual
actuarial valuation report results including the funded ratio, actuarial
contribution, and expected revenue sources using several assumed investment
return scenarios that the actuary deems to be reasonable, and shall make a
recommendation to the board as part of the annual actuarial valuation report.
(c) If the state contribution rate has been adjusted to less than five
percent and the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets is below one
hundred percent for two consecutive years as reported in the annual actuarial
valuation report, the actuary shall assess whether the percentage of the state
contribution rate should be adjusted based on projected annual actuarial
valuation report results including the funded ratio, actuarial contribution,
and expected revenue sources using several assumed investment return scenarios
that the actuary deems to be reasonable, and shall make a recommendation to the
board as part of the annual actuarial valuation report.
(d) If an annual actuarial valuation report includes a recommendation from
the actuary to adjust the contribution rate as described in subdivision (b) or
(c) of this subsection, the board shall provide written notice electronically
to the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature, to the
Governor, and to the Supreme Court of such recommendation within seven business
days after voting to approve an annual actuarial valuation report. The notice
shall include the actuary's recommendation and analysis regarding such
adjustment.
(e) Following receipt of the actuary's recommendation and analysis
pursuant to this subsection, the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the
Legislature shall determine the amount of any adjustment of the contribution
rate and, if necessary, shall propose any such adjustment to the Legislature.
(7) The state or county shall pick up the member contributions required by
-12-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
this section for all compensation paid on or after January 1, 1985, and the
contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions pursuant
to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code in determining federal tax
treatment under the code and shall not be included as gross income of the
member until such time as they are distributed or made available. The
contributions, although designated as member contributions, shall be paid by
the state or county in lieu of member contributions. The state or county shall
pay these member contributions from the same source of funds which is used in
paying earnings to the member. The state or county shall pick up these
contributions by a compensation deduction through a reduction in the
compensation of the member. Member contributions picked up shall be treated for
all purposes of the Judges Retirement Act in the same manner and to the extent
as member contributions made prior to the date picked up.
Sec. 7. Section 24-703.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
24-703.01 No judge shall be authorized to participate in the retirement
system provided for in the Judges Retirement Act unless the judge is a United
States citizen or is lawfully present in the United States. The court and the
judge shall maintain at least one of the following documents, which shall be
unexpired , if applicable to the particular document or which has an expiration
date that has been extended by the United States Department of Homeland
Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services so that such
document is still valid, to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful
presence in the United States as of the judge's date of hire and produce any
such document so maintained upon request of the board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems:
(1) A state-issued driver's license;
(2) A state-issued identification card;
(3) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(4) (3) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(5) (4) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(6) (5) A United States passport;
(7) (6) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(8) (7) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(9) (8) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(10) (9) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(11) (10) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(12) (11) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(13) (12) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
board.
Sec. 8. Section 42-1102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
42-1102 For purposes of the Spousal Pension Rights Act:
(1) Alternate payee means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other
dependent of a member who is recognized by a domestic relations order as having
a right to receive all or a portion of the benefits payable by a statewide
public retirement system with respect to such member;
(2) Benefit means an annuity, a pension, a retirement allowance, a
withdrawal of accumulated contributions, or an optional benefit accrued or
accruing to a member under a statewide public retirement system;
(3) Domestic relations order means a judgment, decree, or order, including
approval of a property settlement agreement, which relates to the provision of
child support, alimony payments, maintenance support, or marital property
rights to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a member and is
made pursuant to a state domestic relations law of this state or another state;
(4) Earliest retirement date means the earlier of (a) the date on which
the member is entitled to a distribution under the system or (b) the later of
(i) the date that the member attains fifty years of age or (ii) the earliest
date that the member could receive benefits under the system if the member
separated from service;
(5) Qualified domestic relations order means a domestic relations order
which creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee's right, or
assigns to an alternate payee the right, to receive all or a portion of the
benefits payable with respect to a member under a statewide public retirement
system, which directs the system to disburse benefits to the alternate payee,
and which meets the requirements of section 42-1103;
(6) Segregated amounts means the amounts which would have been payable to
the alternative payee during the period of time that the qualified status of an
order is being determined. Such amounts shall equal the amounts payable for
such period if the order had been determined to be a qualified domestic
relations order; and
(7) Statewide public retirement system means the Retirement System for
Nebraska Counties, the Nebraska Judges Retirement System as provided in the
Judges Retirement Act, the School Employees Retirement System of the State of
Nebraska, any Class V school employees retirement system, the Nebraska State
Patrol Retirement System, and the State Employees Retirement System of the
-13-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
State of Nebraska.
Sec. 9. Section 79-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-902 For purposes of the School Employees Retirement Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Accumulated contributions means the sum of all amounts deducted from
the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in
the School Retirement Fund together with regular interest thereon, compounded
monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually;
(2)(a) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the aggregate
amounts expected to be received under different forms of payment.
(b) For a school employee hired before July 1, 2017, the determinations
shall be based on the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table reflecting sex-
distinct factors blended using twenty-five percent of the male table and
seventy-five percent of the female table. An interest rate of eight percent per
annum shall be reflected in making these determinations except when a lump-sum
settlement is made to an estate.
(c) For a school employee hired on or after July 1, 2017, or rehired on or
after July 1, 2017, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit or taking a refund of contributions, the determinations shall be based
on a unisex mortality table and an interest rate specified by the board. Both
the mortality table and the interest rate shall be recommended by the actuary
and approved by the retirement board following an actuarial experience study, a
benefit adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The mortality table, interest
rate, and actuarial factors in effect on the school employee's retirement date
will be used to calculate actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such
interest rate may be, but is not required to be, equal to the assumed rate.
(d) If the lump-sum settlement is made to an estate, the interest rate
will be determined by the AAA-rated segment of the Bloomberg Barclays Long U.S.
Corporate Bond Index as of the prior June 30, rounded to the next lower quarter
percent. If the AAA-rated segment of the Bloomberg Barclays Long U.S. Corporate
Bond Index is discontinued or replaced, a substitute index shall be selected by
the board which shall be a reasonably representative index;
(3) Beneficiary means any person in receipt of a school retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by the act;
(4)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the member
for personal services performed during the plan year and includes (i) overtime
pay, (ii) member retirement contributions, (iii) retroactive salary payments
paid pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and grievance
settlements, and (iv) amounts contributed by the member to plans under sections
125, 403(b), and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section
49-801.01 or any other section of the code which defers or excludes such
amounts from income, and (v) leave of absence pay.
(b) Compensation does not include (i) fraudulently obtained amounts as
determined by the retirement board, (ii) amounts for accrued unused sick leave
or accrued unused vacation leave converted to cash payments, (iii) insurance
premiums converted into cash payments, (iv) reimbursement for expenses
incurred, (v) fringe benefits, (vi) per diems paid as expenses, (vii) bonuses
for services not actually rendered, (viii) early retirement inducements, (ix)
cash awards, (x) severance pay, or (xi) employer contributions made for the
purposes of separation payments made at retirement.
(c) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 shall be
disregarded. For an employee who was a member of the retirement system before
the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995, the limitation on
compensation shall not be less than the amount which was allowed to be taken
into account under the retirement system as in effect on July 1, 1993;
(5) County school official means (a) until July 1, 2000, the county
superintendent or district superintendent and any person serving in his or her
office who is required by law to have a teacher's certificate and (b) on or
after July 1, 2000, the county superintendent, county school administrator, or
district superintendent and any person serving in his or her office who is
required by law to have a teacher's certificate;
(6)(a) Creditable service means prior service for which credit is granted
under sections 79-926 to 79-929, service credit purchased under sections
79-933.03 to 79-933.06 and 79-933.08, and all service rendered while a
contributing member of the retirement system; and
(b) Creditable service includes working days, sick days, vacation days,
holidays, and any other leave days for which the employee is paid regular wages
as part of the employee's agreement with the employer. Creditable service does
not include lump-sum payments to the employee upon termination or retirement in
lieu of accrued benefits for such days, eligibility and vesting credit, service
years for which member contributions are withdrawn and not repaid by the
member, service rendered for which the retirement board determines that the
member was paid less in compensation than the minimum wage as provided in the
Wage and Hour Act, service which the board determines was rendered with the
intent to defraud the retirement system, or service provided to an employer in
a retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act;
(7) Current benefit means the initial benefit increased by all adjustments
made pursuant to the School Employees Retirement Act;
(8) Disability means an inability to engage in any substantially gainful
activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment
-14-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
which was initially diagnosed or became disabling while the member was an
active participant in the plan and which can be expected to result in death or
be of a long-continued and indefinite duration;
(9) Disability retirement allowance means the annuity paid to a person
upon retirement for disability under section 79-952;
(10) Disability retirement date means the first day of the month following
the date upon which a member's request for disability retirement is received on
a retirement application provided by the retirement system if the member has
terminated employment in the school system and has complied with sections
79-951 to 79-954 as such sections refer to disability retirement;
(11) Early retirement inducement means, but is not limited to:
(a) A benefit, bonus, or payment to a member in exchange for an agreement
by the member to terminate from employment;
(b) A benefit, bonus, or payment paid to a member in addition to the
member's retirement benefit;
(c) Lump-sum or installment cash payments, except payments for accrued
unused leave converted to cash payments;
(d) An additional salary or wage component of any kind that is being paid
as an incentive to leave employment and not for personal services performed for
which creditable service is granted;
(e) Partial or full employer payment of a member's health, dental, life,
or long-term disability insurance benefits or cash in lieu of such insurance
benefits that extend beyond the member's termination of employment and contract
of employment dates. This subdivision does not apply to any period during which
the member is contributing to the retirement system and being awarded
creditable service; and
(f) Any other form of separation payments made by an employer to a member
at termination, including, but not limited to, purchasing retirement annuity
contracts for the member pursuant to section 79-514, depositing money for the
member in an account established under section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code except for payments for accrued unused leave, or purchasing service credit
for the member pursuant to section 79-933.08;
(12) Eligibility and vesting credit means credit for years, or a fraction
of a year, of participation in a Nebraska government plan for purposes of
determining eligibility for benefits under the School Employees Retirement Act.
Such credit shall not be included as years of creditable service in the benefit
calculation;
(13) Emeritus member means a person (a) who has entered retirement under
the act, including those persons who have retired since July 1, 1945, under any
other regularly established retirement or pension system as contemplated by
section 79-916, (b) who has thereafter been reemployed in any capacity by a
public school, a Class V school district, or a school under the control and
management of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, the Board
of Regents of the University of Nebraska, or a community college board of
governors or has become a state school official or county school official
subsequent to such retirement, and (c) who has applied to the board for
emeritus membership in the retirement system. The school district or agency
shall certify to the retirement board on forms prescribed by the retirement
board that the annuitant was reemployed, rendered a service, and was paid by
the district or agency for such services;
(14) Employer means the State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof or
agency of the state or subdivision authorized by law to hire school employees
or to pay their compensation;
(15)(a) Final average compensation means:
(i) Except as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision:
(A) The sum of the member's total compensation during the three twelve-
month periods of service as a school employee in which such compensation was
the greatest divided by thirty-six; or
(B) If a member has such compensation for less than thirty-six months, the
sum of the member's total compensation in all months divided by the total
number of months of his or her creditable service therefor; and
(ii) For an employee who became a member on or after July 1, 2013:
(A) The sum of the member's total compensation during the five twelve-
month periods of service as a school employee in which such compensation was
the greatest divided by sixty; or
(B) If a member has such compensation for less than sixty months, the sum
of the member's total compensation in all months divided by the total number of
months of his or her creditable service therefor.
(b) Payments under the Retirement Incentive Plan pursuant to section
79-855 and Staff Development Assistance pursuant to section 79-856 shall not be
included in the determination of final average compensation;
(16) Fiscal year means any year beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next
following;
(17) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(18) Initial benefit means the retirement benefit calculated at the time
of retirement;
(19) Member means any person who has an account in the School Retirement
Fund;
(20) Participation means qualifying for and making required deposits to
the retirement system during the course of a plan year;
(21) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on July 1 and
ending on June 30 of the following year;
-15-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(22) Prior service means service rendered as a school employee in the
public schools of the State of Nebraska prior to July 1, 1945;
(23) Public school means any and all schools offering instruction in
elementary or high school grades, as defined in section 79-101, which schools
are supported by public funds and are wholly under the control and management
of the State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof, including (a) schools or
other entities established, maintained, and controlled by the school boards of
local school districts, except Class V school districts, (b) any educational
service unit, and (c) any other educational institution wholly supported by
public funds, except schools under the control and management of the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, the Board of Regents of the University
of Nebraska, or the community college boards of governors for any community
college areas;
(24) Regular employee means an employee hired by a public school or under
contract in a regular full-time or part-time position who works a full-time or
part-time schedule on an ongoing basis for twenty or more hours per week. An
employee hired as described in this subdivision to provide service for less
than twenty hours per week but who provides service for an average of twenty
hours or more per week in each calendar month of any three calendar months of a
plan year shall, beginning with the next full payroll period, commence
contributions and shall be deemed a regular employee for all future employment
with the same employer. The twenty-hour-per-week threshold shall be calculated
by dividing the total number of hours of service provided for the same employer
in a calendar month by the total number of calendar days in the month, and
multiplying such number by seven;
(25) Regular interest means interest fixed at a rate equal to the daily
treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities, as published by the
Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that applies on July 1 of each
year, which may be credited monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually as
the board may direct;
(26) Relinquished creditable service means, with respect to a member who
has withdrawn his or her accumulated contributions under section 79-955, the
total amount of creditable service which such member has given up as a result
of his or her election not to remain a member of the retirement system;
(27) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the deferral of
distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions pursuant to
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued
thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the plan;
and
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a member
who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who attained
seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020, and prior to
January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who attained
seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-three years of
age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who attained
seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the plan;
and
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(28) Required deposit means the deduction from a member's compensation as
provided for in section 79-958 which shall be deposited in the School
Retirement Fund;
(29) Retirement means qualifying for and accepting a school or disability
retirement allowance granted under the School Employees Retirement Act;
(30) Retirement application means the form approved and provided by the
retirement system for acceptance of a member's request for either regular or
disability retirement;
(31) Retirement board or board means the Public Employees Retirement
Board;
(32) Retirement date means (a) if the member has terminated employment,
the first day of the month following the date upon which a member's request for
retirement is received on a retirement application provided by the retirement
system or (b) if the member has filed a retirement application but has not yet
terminated employment, the first day of the month following the date on which
the member terminates employment. An application may be filed no more than two
hundred seventy one hundred twenty days prior to the effective date of the
member's initial benefit;
(33) Retirement system means the School Employees Retirement System of the
State of Nebraska;
(34) Savings annuity means payments for life, made in equal monthly
payments, derived from the accumulated contributions of a member;
(35) School employee means a contributing member who earns service credit
pursuant to section 79-927. For purposes of this section, contributing member
means the following persons who receive compensation from a public school: (a)
Regular employees; (b) regular employees having retired pursuant to the School
Employees Retirement Act who subsequently provide compensated service on a
regular basis in any capacity; and (c) regular employees hired by a public
school on an ongoing basis to assume the duties of other regular employees who
-16-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
are temporarily absent. Substitute employees, temporary employees, and
employees who have not attained the age of eighteen years shall not be
considered school employees;
(36) School retirement allowance means the total of the savings annuity
and the service annuity or formula annuity paid a person who has retired under
sections 79-931 to 79-935. The monthly payments shall be payable at the end of
each calendar month during the life of a retired member. The first payment
shall include all amounts accrued since the effective date of the award of
annuity. The last payment shall be at the end of the calendar month in which
such member dies or in accordance with the payment option chosen by the member;
(37) School year means one fiscal year which includes not less than one
thousand instructional hours or, in the case of service in the State of
Nebraska prior to July 1, 1945, not less than seventy-five percent of the then
legal school year;
(38) Service means employment as a school employee and shall not be deemed
interrupted by (a) termination at the end of the school year of the contract of
employment of an employee in a public school if the employee enters into a
contract of employment in any public school, except a school in a Class V
school district, for the following school year, (b) temporary or seasonal
suspension of service that does not terminate the employee's employment, (c)
leave of absence authorized by the employer for a period not exceeding twelve
months, (d) leave of absence because of disability, or (e) military service
when properly authorized by the retirement board. Service does not include any
period of disability for which disability retirement benefits are received
under sections 79-951 to 79-953;
(39) Service annuity means payments for life, made in equal monthly
installments, derived from appropriations made by the State of Nebraska to the
retirement system;
(40) State deposit means the deposit by the state in the retirement system
on behalf of any member;
(41) State school official means the Commissioner of Education and his or
her professional staff who are required by law or by the State Department of
Education to hold a certificate as such term is defined in section 79-807;
(42) Substitute employee means a person hired by a public school as a
temporary employee to assume the duties of regular employees due to a temporary
absence of any regular employees. Substitute employee does not mean a person
hired as a regular employee on an ongoing basis to assume the duties of other
regular employees who are temporarily absent;
(43) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the member on the
date of the member's death or (b) the spouse or former spouse of the member if
survivorship rights are provided under a qualified domestic relations order
filed with the board pursuant to the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The spouse or
former spouse shall supersede the spouse married to the member on the date of
the member's death as provided under a qualified domestic relations order. If
the benefits payable to the spouse or former spouse under a qualified domestic
relations order are less than the value of benefits entitled to the surviving
spouse, the spouse married to the member on the date of the member's death
shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of the benefits;
(44) Temporary employee means an employee hired by a public school who is
not a regular employee and who is hired to provide service for a limited period
of time to accomplish a specific purpose or task. When such specific purpose or
task is complete, the employment of such temporary employee shall terminate and
in no case shall the temporary employment period exceed one year in duration;
(45)(a) Termination of employment or termination occurs on the date the
member experiences a bona fide separation from service with the member's
employer. The date of the separation is the end of the member's contractual
agreement or, if there is no contract or only partial fulfillment of a
contract, as determined by the employer.
(b) A member shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment if the board determines based on the facts and circumstances that:
(i) A claimed termination was not a bona fide separation from service with
the member's employer;
(ii) A member was compensated for a full contractual period when the
member stopped working prior to the end date of the contract; or
(iii) A member prearranged a return to work that violates the provisions
of the School Employees Retirement Act.
(c) A member who experiences a separation from service must comply with
the return-to-work provisions of section 79-930 if the member is subsequently
employed by an employer participating in the retirement system.
(d) Nothing in this subdivision precludes an employer from adopting a
policy which limits or denies employees who have experienced a separation from
service with the employer from working as a volunteer or substitute employee
within one hundred eighty days after the employee experiences such separation
from service; and
(46) Voluntary service or volunteer means providing bona fide unpaid
service to any employer.
Sec. 10. Section 79-904.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-904.01 (1)(a) If the board determines that the retirement system has
previously received contributions or distributed benefits which for any reason
are not in accordance with the statutory provisions of the School Employees
Retirement Act, the board may refund contributions, require additional
contributions, adjust benefits, or require repayment of benefits paid. In the
-17-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
event of an overpayment of a benefit, the board may, in addition to other
remedies, offset future benefit payments by the amount of the prior
overpayment, together with regular interest thereon. In the event of a material
underpayment of a benefit, the board shall immediately make payment equal to
the deficit amount plus regular interest.
(b) The board shall have the power, through the director of the Nebraska
Public Employees Retirement Systems or the director's designee, to make a
thorough investigation of any overpayment of a benefit, when in the judgment of
the retirement system such investigation is necessary, including, but not
limited to, circumstances in which benefit payments are made after the death of
a member or beneficiary and the retirement system is not made aware of such
member's or beneficiary's death. In connection with any such investigation, the
board, through the director or the director's designee, shall have the power to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers,
records, and documents, whether in hardcopy, electronic form, or otherwise, and
issue subpoenas for such purposes. Such subpoenas shall be served in the same
manner and have the same effect as subpoenas from district courts.
(2) If the board determines that termination of employment has not
occurred and a retirement benefit has been paid to a member of the retirement
system pursuant to section 79-933, such member shall repay the benefit to the
retirement system unless the board determines that all or any portion of such
benefit was the result of an inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of
such benefit would create a significant hardship.
(3) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations implementing
this section, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)
The procedures for refunding contributions, adjusting future contributions or
benefit payments, and requiring additional contributions or repayment of
benefits; (b) the process for a member, member's beneficiary, employee, or
employer to dispute an adjustment of contributions or benefits; and (c) notice
provided to all affected persons. All notices shall be sent at the time of or
prior to an adjustment and shall describe the process for disputing an
adjustment of contributions or benefits.
(4) The board shall not refund contributions made on compensation in
excess of the limitations imposed by subdivision (4) of section 79-902 or
subsection (9) of section 79-934.
Sec. 11. Section 79-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-915 (1) Persons residing outside of the United States and engaged
temporarily as school employees in the State of Nebraska shall not become
members of the retirement system.
(2) No school employee shall be authorized to participate in the
retirement system provided for in the School Employees Retirement Act unless
the employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United
States. The employing public school and the school employee shall maintain at
least one of the following documents, which shall be unexpired , if applicable
to the particular document or which has an expiration date that has been
extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security or the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services so that such document is still
valid, to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the
United States as of the employee's date of hire and produce any such document
so maintained upon request of the retirement board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
retirement board.
(3)(a) The board may determine that a governmental entity currently
participating in the retirement system no longer qualifies, in whole or in
part, under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code as a participating
employer in a governmental plan.
(b)(i) To aid governmental entities in their business decisionmaking
process, any governmental entity currently participating in the retirement
system contemplating a business transaction that may result in such entity no
longer qualifying, in whole or in part, under section 414(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code may notify the board in writing as soon as reasonably practicable,
but no later than one hundred eighty days before the transaction is to occur.
(ii) The board when timely notified shall, as soon as is reasonably
-18-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
practicable, obtain from its contracted actuary the cost of any actuarial study
necessary to determine the potential funding obligation. The board will notify
the entity of such cost.
(iii) If such entity pays the board's contracted actuary pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c)(vi) of this section for any actuarial study necessary to
determine the potential funding obligation, the board shall, as soon as
reasonably practicable following its receipt of the actuarial study, (A)
determine whether the entity's contemplated business transaction will cause the
entity to no longer qualify under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code,
(B) determine whether the contemplated business transaction constitutes a plan
termination by the entity, (C) determine the potential funding obligation, (D)
determine the administrative costs that will be incurred by the board or the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's
removal from the retirement system, and (E) notify the entity of such
determinations.
(iv) Failure to timely notify the board pursuant to subdivision (3)(b)(i)
of this section may result in the entity being treated as though the board made
a decision pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(c) If the board makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of
this section, or if the entity engages in the contemplated business transaction
reviewed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section that results in the entity no
longer qualifying under section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) The board shall notify the entity that it no longer qualifies under
section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code within ten business days after the
determination;
(ii) The affected plan members shall be immediately considered fully
vested;
(iii) The affected plan members shall become inactive within ninety days
after the board's determination;
(iv) The entity shall pay to the School Retirement Fund an amount equal to
any funding obligation;
(v) The entity shall pay to the Expense Fund an amount equal to any
administrative costs incurred by the board or the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems in connection with the entity's removal from the retirement
system; and
(vi) The entity shall pay directly to the board's contracted actuary an
amount equal to the cost of any actuarial study necessary to aid the board in
determining the amount of such funding obligation, if not previously paid.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Business transaction means a merger; consolidation; sale of assets,
equipment, or facilities; termination of a division, department, section, or
subgroup of the entity; or any other business transaction that results in
termination of some or all of the entity's workforce; and
(ii) Funding obligation means the financial liability of the retirement
system to provide benefits for the affected plan members incurred by the
retirement system due to the entity's business transaction calculated using the
methodology and assumptions recommended by the board's contracted actuary and
approved by the board. The methodology and assumptions used must be structured
in a way that ensures the entity is financially liable for all the costs of the
entity's business transaction, and the retirement system is not financially
liable for any of the cost of the entity's business transaction.
(e) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
this subsection including, but not limited to, the methods of notifying the
board of pending business transactions, the acceptable methods of payment, and
the timing of such payment.
Sec. 12. Section 79-956, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-956 (1)(a) Except as provided in section 42-1107, if a member dies
before the member's retirement date, the member's accumulated contributions
shall be paid pursuant to section 79-969.
(b) Except for payment to an alternative payee pursuant to a qualified
domestic relations order, if no legal representative or beneficiary applies for
such accumulated contributions, the contributions shall be distributed in
accordance with the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.
(2) When the deceased member has twenty years or more of creditable
service regardless of age or dies on or after his or her sixty-fifth birthday
and leaves a surviving spouse who has been designated by the member as the sole
surviving primary beneficiary, on forms provided by the board, as of the date
of the member's death, such beneficiary may elect, within twelve months after
the death of the member, to receive (a) a refund of the member's contribution
account balance, including interest, plus an additional one hundred one percent
of the member's contribution account balance, including interest, or (b) an
annuity which shall be equal to the amount that would have accrued to the
member had he or she elected to have the retirement annuity paid as a one-
hundred-percent joint and survivor annuity payable as long as either the member
or the member's spouse should survive and had the member retired (i) on the
date of death if his or her age at death is sixty-five years or more or (ii) at
age sixty-five years if his or her age at death is less than sixty-five years.
(3) When the deceased member who was a school employee on or after May 1,
2001, has not less than five years of creditable service and less than twenty
years of creditable service and dies before his or her sixty-fifth birthday and
leaves a surviving spouse who has been designated in writing as beneficiary and
who, as of the date of the member's death, is the sole surviving primary
-19-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
beneficiary, such beneficiary may elect, within twelve months after the death
of the member, to receive (a) a refund of the member's contribution account
balance with interest plus an additional one hundred one percent of the
member's contribution account balance with interest or (b) an annuity payable
monthly for the surviving spouse's lifetime which shall be equal to the benefit
amount that had accrued to the member at the date of the member's death,
commencing when the member would have reached age sixty, or the member's age at
death if greater, reduced by three percent for each year payments commence
before the member would have reached age sixty-five, and adjusted for payment
in the form of a one-hundred-percent joint and survivor annuity.
(4)(a) If the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section are
not met, a lump sum equal to all contributions to the fund made by such member
plus regular interest shall be paid pursuant to section 79-969. Lump sum
payments to multiple individuals made under this section, when appropriate, may
be made independently of each other.
(b) An application for benefits under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section shall be deemed to have been timely filed if the application is
received by the retirement system within twelve months after the date of the
death of the member.
(5) Benefits to which a surviving spouse, beneficiary, or estate of a
member shall be entitled pursuant to this section shall commence immediately
upon the death of such member.
(6) A lump-sum death benefit paid to the member's beneficiary, other than
the member's estate, that is an eligible distribution may be distributed in the
form of a direct transfer to a retirement plan eligible to receive such
transfer under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.
(7) For any member whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2007, while
performing qualified military service as defined in section 414(u) of the
Internal Revenue Code, the member's beneficiary shall be entitled to any
additional death benefit that would have been provided, other than the accrual
of any benefit relating to the period of qualified military service. The
additional death benefit shall be determined as if the member had returned to
employment with the employer and such employment had terminated on the date of
the member's death.
Sec. 13. Section 79-978, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-978 For purposes of the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Accumulated contributions means the sum of amounts contributed by a
member of the system together with regular interest credited thereon;
(2) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the retirement
allowance for early retirement or the retirement allowance for an optional form
of annuity, or both, with the normal form of the annuity to be paid, as
determined by the application of the appropriate actuarial table, except that
use of such actuarial tables shall not effect a reduction in benefits accrued
prior to September 1, 1985, as determined by the actuarial tables in use prior
to such date;
(3) Actuarial tables means:
(a) For determining the actuarial equivalent of any annuities other than
joint and survivorship annuities:
(i) For members hired before July 1, 2018, a unisex mortality table using
twenty-five percent of the male mortality and seventy-five percent of the
female mortality from the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table with a One Year
Setback and using an interest rate of eight percent compounded annually; and
(ii) For members hired on or after July 1, 2018, or rehired on or after
July 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit, the determinations shall be based on a unisex mortality table and an
interest rate specified by (A) the board until September 1, 2024, or (B) the
retirement board beginning on September 1, 2024. Both the mortality table and
the interest rate shall be recommended by the actuary retained pursuant to
section 79-984 following an actuarial experience study, a benefit adequacy
study, or a plan valuation. The mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial
factors in effect on the member's retirement date shall be used to calculate
the actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such interest rate may be,
but is not required to be, equal to the assumed rate; and
(b) For joint and survivorship annuities:
(i) For members hired before July 1, 2018, a unisex retiree mortality
table using sixty-five percent of the male mortality and thirty-five percent of
the female mortality from the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table with a One
Year Setback and using an interest rate of eight percent compounded annually
and a unisex joint annuitant mortality table using thirty-five percent of the
male mortality and sixty-five percent of the female mortality from the 1994
Group Annuity Mortality Table with a One Year Setback and using an interest
rate of eight percent compounded annually; and
(ii) For members hired on or after July 1, 2018, or rehired on or after
July 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit, the determinations shall be based on a unisex mortality table and an
interest rate specified by (A) the board until September 1, 2024, or (B) the
retirement board beginning on September 1, 2024. Both the mortality table and
the interest rate shall be recommended by the actuary retained pursuant to
section 79-984 following an actuarial experience study, a benefit adequacy
study, or a plan valuation. The mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial
factors in effect on the member's retirement date shall be used to calculate
-20-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
the actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such interest rate may be,
but is not required to be, equal to the assumed rate;
(4) Administrator of the retirement system or administrator means (a)
until September 1, 2024, the person administering the retirement system who is
appointed by the board or (b) beginning on September 1, 2024, the director
appointed by the retirement board pursuant to section 84-1503;
(5) Annuitant means any member receiving an allowance;
(6) Annuity means annual payments, for both prior service and membership
service, for life as provided in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act;
(7) Audit year means the period beginning January 1 in any year and ending
on December 31 of that same year, which is the period of time used in the
preparation of (a) the annual actuarial analysis and valuation and (b) a
financial audit of the retirement system, including the investments of the
retirement system;
(8) Beneficiary means any person entitled to receive or receiving a
benefit by reason of the death of a member;
(9) Board means the board of trustees until July 1, 2021, and the board of
education beginning July 1, 2021, and until September 1, 2024;
(10) Board of education means the board or boards of education of a school
district or districts;
(11) Board of trustees means:
(a) Until September 1, 2024, the entity established pursuant to section
79-980; and
(b) Beginning September 1, 2024, the board of education shall be deemed to
be the successor in interest for all liability associated with the actions or
inactions of the entity identified under subdivision (11)(a) of this section
and as specified in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act;
(12)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the member
during a fiscal year and includes (i) overtime pay, (ii) member contributions
to the retirement system that are picked up under section 414(h) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 49-801.01, (iii) retroactive
salary payments paid pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and
grievance settlements, and (iv) amounts contributed by the member to plans
under sections 125, 403(b), and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in
section 49-801.01, or any other section of the code which defers or excludes
such amounts from income.
(b) Compensation does not include (i) fraudulently obtained amounts as
determined by the board, (ii) amounts for accrued unused sick leave or accrued
unused vacation leave converted to cash payments, (iii) insurance premiums
converted into cash payments, (iv) reimbursement for expenses incurred, (v)
fringe benefits, (vi) per diems paid as expenses, (vii) bonuses for services
not actually rendered, (viii) early retirement inducements, (ix) cash awards,
(x) severance pay, or (xi) employer contributions made for the purposes of
separation payments made at retirement and early retirement inducements.
(c) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 49-801.01, shall be
disregarded;
(13) Council means the Nebraska Investment Council created and acting
pursuant to section 72-1237;
(14) Creditable service means the sum of the membership service and the
prior service, measured in one-tenth-year increments;
(15) Early retirement date means, for members hired prior to July 1, 2016,
who have attained age fifty-five, that month and year selected by a member
having at least ten years of creditable service which includes a minimum of
five years of membership service. Early retirement date means, for members
hired on or after July 1, 2016, that month and year selected by a member having
at least five years of membership creditable service and who has attained age
sixty;
(16) Early retirement inducement means, but is not limited to:
(a) A benefit, bonus, or payment to a member by an employer in exchange
for an agreement by the member to retire with a reduced retirement benefit;
(b) A benefit, bonus, or payment paid to a member by an employer in
addition to the member's retirement benefit;
(c) Lump-sum or installment cash payments by an employer, except payments
for accrued unused leave converted to cash payments;
(d) An additional salary or wage component of any kind that is being paid
by an employer as an incentive to leave employment and not for personal
services performed for which creditable service is granted;
(e) Partial or full employer payment of a member's health, dental, life,
or long-term disability insurance benefits or cash in lieu of such insurance
benefits that extend beyond the member's termination of employment and contract
of employment dates. This subdivision does not apply to any period during which
the member is contributing to the retirement system and being awarded
creditable service; and
(f) Any other form of separation payments made by an employer to a member
at termination, including, but not limited to, purchasing retirement contracts
for the member pursuant to section 79-514, or depositing money for the member
in an account established under section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
except for payments for accrued unused leave;
(17) Employee means the following enumerated persons receiving
compensation from the school district: (a) Teachers, other than substitutes,
employed on a written contract basis; (b) administrators employed on a written
contract, agreement, or document basis; and (c) regular employees;
-21-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(18) Employer means a school district participating in a retirement system
established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act;
(19) Fiscal year means the period beginning September 1 in any year and
ending on August 31 of the next succeeding year;
(20) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(21) Interest means, for the purchase of service credit, the purchase of
prior service credit, restored refunds, and delayed payments, the investment
return assumption used in the most recent actuarial valuation;
(22) Member means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system or any former employee who has made contributions to the
system and has not received a refund;
(23) Membership service means service on or after September 1, 1951, as an
employee of the school district and a member of the system for which
compensation is paid by the school district. Credit for more than one year of
membership service shall not be allowed for service rendered in any fiscal
year. Beginning September 1, 2005, a member shall be credited with a year of
membership service for each fiscal year in which the member performs one
thousand or more hours of compensated service as an employee of the school
district. For an employee who becomes a member prior to July 1, 2018, an hour
of compensated service shall include any hour for which the member is
compensated by the school district during periods when no service is performed
due to vacation or approved leave. For an employee who becomes a member on or
after July 1, 2018, an hour of compensated service shall include any hour for
which the member is compensated by the school district during periods when no
service is performed due to used accrued sick days, used accrued vacation days,
federal and state holidays, and jury duty leave for which the member is paid
full compensation by an employer. If a member performs less than one thousand
hours of compensated service during a fiscal year, one-tenth of a year of
membership service shall be credited for each one hundred hours of compensated
service by the member in such fiscal year. In determining a member's total
membership service, all periods of membership service, including fractional
years of membership service in one-tenth-year increments, shall be aggregated;
(24) Military service means service in the uniformed services as defined
in 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq., as such provision existed on March 27, 1997;
(25) Normal retirement date means the end of the month during which the
member attains age sixty-five and has completed at least five years of
membership service;
(26) Participation means qualifying for and making required deposits to
the retirement system during the course of a fiscal year;
(27) Primary beneficiary means the person or persons entitled to receive
or receiving a benefit by reason of the death of a member;
(28) Prior service means service rendered prior to September 1, 1951, for
which credit is allowed under section 79-999, service rendered by retired
employees receiving benefits under preexisting systems, and service for which
credit is allowed under sections 79-990, 79-991, 79-994, 79-995, and 79-997;
(29)(a) Regular employee means a person hired on a full-time basis, which
basis shall contemplate a work week of not less than thirty hours, and who is
not (i) a teacher employed on a written contract basis or (ii) an administrator
employed on a written contract, agreement, or document basis.
(b) Effective September 1, 2021, a person hired by an employer or under
contract to provide service for less than thirty hours per week but who
provides service for an average of thirty hours or more per week in each
calendar month of any three calendar months of a fiscal year shall, beginning
with the next full payroll period: ,
(i) Commence commence contributions; and shall be
(ii) Be deemed a regular employee; and
(iii) Remain a deemed regular employee regardless of hours worked
thereafter;
(30) Regular interest means interest (a) on the total contributions of the
member prior to the close of the last preceding fiscal year, (b) compounded
annually, and (c)(i) beginning September 1, 2016, at a rate equal to the daily
treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities, as published by the
Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that applies on September 1 of
each year and (ii) prior to September 1, 2016, at rates to be determined
annually by the board, which shall have the sole, absolute, and final
discretionary authority to make such determination, except that the rate for
any given year in no event shall exceed the actual percentage of net earnings
of the system during the last preceding fiscal year;
(31) Retirement allowance means the total annual retirement benefit
payable to a member for service or disability;
(32) Retirement application means beginning on and after September 1,
2024, the form approved and provided by the retirement system for acceptance of
a member's request for either regular or disability retirement;
(33) Retirement board means the Public Employees Retirement Board created
and acting pursuant to section 84-1501;
(34) Retirement date means the date of retirement of a member for service
or disability as fixed by (a) the board for retirements occurring prior to
September 1, 2024, or (b) the retirement board for retirements occurring on or
after September 1, 2024;
(35) Retirement system or system means the School Employees' Retirement
System of (corporate name of the school district as described in section
79-405) as provided for by the act;
-22-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(36) School district means an employer participating in a retirement
system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act;
(37) Secondary beneficiary means the person or persons entitled to receive
or receiving a benefit by reason of the death of all primary beneficiaries
prior to the death of the member. If no primary beneficiary survives the
member, secondary beneficiaries shall be treated in the same manner as primary
beneficiaries;
(38) Solvency means the rate of all contributions required pursuant to the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act is equal to or greater than the
actuarially required contribution rate as annotated in the most recent
valuation report prepared by the actuary retained for the retirement system as
provided in section 79-984;
(39) State investment officer means the person appointed by the council
pursuant to section 72-1240 and acting pursuant to the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act;
(40) Substitute employee means a person hired by an employer as a
temporary employee to assume the duties of an employee due to a temporary
absence of any employee. Substitute employee does not mean a person hired as an
employee on an ongoing basis to assume the duties of other employees who are
temporarily absent;
(41) Temporary employee means a person hired by an employer who is not an
employee and who is hired to provide service for a limited period of time to
accomplish a specific purpose or task. When such specific purpose or task is
complete, the employment of such temporary employee shall terminate and in no
case shall the temporary employment period exceed one year in duration;
(42)(a) Termination of employment or termination occurs on the date the
member experiences a bona fide separation from service of employment with the
member's employer, the date of which separation is the last day of service
under the member's contractual agreement or, if there is no contract or only
partial fulfillment of a contract, as determined by an employer. A member who
experiences a separation from service shall comply with the return-to-work
provisions of section 79-992 if the member returns to work for an employer.
(b) A member shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment if the board determines that, based on the facts and circumstances,
(i) a claimed termination of employment was not a bona fide separation from
service with the employer; (ii) a member was compensated for a full contractual
period when the member stopped working prior to the end date of the member's
employment as determined by the member's contract or labor agreement; or (iii)
a member prearranged a return to work that violates the Class V School
Employees Retirement Act.
(c) Nothing in this subdivision (42) precludes an employer from adopting a
policy which limits or denies employees who have experienced a separation from
service from working as a volunteer or substitute employee within one hundred
eighty days after the employee experiences a separation from service;
(43) Transfer of management means the transition and transfer of the
general management, administration, and operation of the retirement system from
the board of trustees, board of education, and school district to the
retirement board as described in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
Transfer of management does not include:
(a) Transfer of the school district's funding obligations described in the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act or assumption of financial liability
for such funding obligations by (i) the State of Nebraska, (ii) the retirement
board, (iii) the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, (iv) any other
state entity with duties related to administration of the retirement system, or
(v) the council for its investment duties regarding the assets of the
retirement system; or
(b) Merger or consolidation of any Class V school employees retirement
system established under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act with the
School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska or any other
retirement system administered by the retirement board;
(44) Trustee means a trustee provided for in section 79-980; and
(45) Voluntary service or volunteer means providing bona fide unpaid
service to an employer.
Sec. 14. Section 79-9,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-9,103 (1) Any annuity paid on or after September 1, 1983, to a member
who retired prior to February 21, 1982, pursuant to the Class V School
Employees Retirement Act, or to such member's beneficiary, or to a person who
retired under the provisions of the retirement system established by statute
for employees of Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951,
or to such person's beneficiary, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost
of living or wage levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30,
1983, except that such increase shall not exceed the sum of one dollar and
fifty cents per month for each year of creditable service and one dollar per
month for each completed year of retirement as measured from the effective date
of retirement to June 30, 1983. No separate adjustment in such annuity shall be
made as a result of the changes made in section 79-9,113 pursuant to Laws 1983,
LB 488. If a joint and survivor annuity was elected, the increase shall be
actuarially adjusted so that the joint and survivor annuity remains the
actuarial equivalent of the life annuity otherwise payable.
(2) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustment provided in subsection
(1) of this section, any annuity paid on or after September 1, 1986, pursuant
to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement system established
-23-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
by statute for employees of Class V school districts in effect prior to
September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on or before
September 1, 1985, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or
wage levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30, 1986, except
that such increase shall not exceed (a) three and one-half percent for
annuities first paid on or after September 1, 1984, (b) seven percent for
annuities first paid on or after September 1, 1983, but before September 1,
1984, or (c) ten and one-half percent for all other annuities.
(3) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, any annuity paid on or after September 1, 1989,
pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement system
established by statute for employees of Class V school districts in effect
prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on or
before September 1, 1988, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost of
living or wage levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30,
1989, except that such increase shall not exceed (a) three percent for
annuities first paid on or after September 1, 1987, (b) six percent for
annuities first paid on or after September 1, 1986, but before September 1,
1987, or (c) nine percent for all other annuities.
(4) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in subsections
(1), (2), and (3) of this section, any annuity paid on or after September 1,
1992, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts in
effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on
or before October 1, 1991, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost of
living or wage levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30,
1992, except that such increase shall not exceed (a) three percent for
annuities first paid after October 1, 1990, (b) six percent for annuities first
paid after October 1, 1989, but on or before October 1, 1990, or (c) nine
percent for all other annuities.
(5) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in subsections
(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, any annuity paid on or after September
1, 1995, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts in
effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on
or before October 1, 1994, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost of
living or wage levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30,
1995, except that such increase shall not exceed (a) three percent for
annuities first paid after October 1, 1993, (b) six percent for annuities first
paid after October 1, 1992, but on or before October 1, 1993, or (c) nine
percent for all other annuities.
(6) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in subsections
(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, any annuity paid pursuant to the
act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement system established by
statute for employees of Class V school districts in effect prior to September
1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on or before October 1, 1994,
shall be subject to adjustment to equal the greater of (a) the annuity payable
to the member or beneficiary as adjusted, if applicable, under the provisions
of subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section or (b) ninety percent
of the annuity which results when the original annuity that was paid to the
member or beneficiary (before any cost-of-living adjustments under this
section), is adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels
between the commencement date of the annuity and June 30, 1995.
(7) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in subsections
(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section, any annuity paid on or after
September 1, 1998, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the
retirement system established by statute for employees of Class V school
districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment
was dated on or before October 3, 1997, shall be adjusted by the increase in
the cost of living or wage levels between the effective date of retirement and
June 30, 1998, except that such increase shall not exceed (a) three percent for
annuities first paid after October 1, 1996, (b) six percent for annuities first
paid after October 1, 1995, but on or before October 1, 1996, or (c) nine
percent for all other annuities.
(8) Beginning January 1, 2000, and on January 1 of every year thereafter,
for employees of Class V school districts who were members prior to July 1,
2013, a cost-of-living adjustment shall be made for any formula annuity being
paid pursuant to the act, or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts in
effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was dated on
or before October 3 preceding such January 1 adjustment date. The cost-of-
living adjustment for any such annuity shall be the lesser of (a) one and one-
half percent or (b) the increase in the consumer price index from the date such
annuity first became payable through the August 31 preceding the January 1
adjustment date as reduced by the aggregate cost-of-living adjustments
previously made to the annuity pursuant to this section.
(9) Beginning January 1, 2014, and on January 1 of every year thereafter,
for employees of Class V school districts who became members on or after July
1, 2013, a cost-of-living adjustment shall be made for any formula annuity
being paid pursuant to the act and on which the first payment was dated on or
before October 3 preceding such January 1 adjustment date. The cost-of-living
adjustment for any such annuity shall be the lesser of (a) one percent or (b)
the increase in the consumer price index from the date such annuity first
-24-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
became payable through the August 31 preceding the January 1 adjustment date as
reduced by the aggregate cost-of-living adjustments previously made to the
annuity pursuant to this section.
(10) Beginning September 1, 1999, the actuary shall make an annual
valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system. If the annual valuation
made by the actuary, as approved by the board of trustees, indicates that the
system has sufficient actuarial surplus to provide for a cost-of-living
adjustment in addition to the adjustment made pursuant to subsection (8) or (9)
of this section, the board of trustees may, in its discretion, declare by
resolution that each annuity being paid pursuant to the act, or pursuant to the
provisions of the retirement system established by statute for employees of
Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the
first payment was dated on or before October 3 of the year such resolution is
adopted, shall be increased beginning as of the January 1 following the date of
the board of trustees' resolution by such percentage as may be declared by the
board of trustees, except that such increase for any such annuity shall not
exceed the increase in the consumer price index from the date such annuity
first became payable through the applicable valuation date as reduced by the
aggregate cost-of-living adjustments previously made to the annuity pursuant to
this section.
(11) Except for the adjustments pursuant to subsection (13) of this
section, the consumer price index to be used for determining any cost-of-living
adjustment under this section shall be the Consumer Price Index - All Urban
Consumers, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor. If this consumer price index is discontinued or replaced,
a substitute index published by the United States Department of Labor shall be
selected by the board if before September 1, 2024, or by the retirement board
if on or after September 1, 2024. Any substitute index selected shall be a
reasonable representative measurement of the cost of living for retired
employees. An annuity as increased by any cost-of-living adjustment made under
this section shall be considered the base annuity amount for the purpose of
future adjustments pursuant to this section. In no event shall any cost-of-
living adjustment be deemed to affect or increase the amount of the base
retirement annuity of a member as determined under section 79-999 or 79-9,100.
(12) Any decision or determination by the board or retirement board, as
applicable, (a) to declare or not declare a cost-of-living adjustment, (b) as
to whether the annual valuation indicates a sufficient actuarial surplus to
provide for a cost-of-living adjustment, or (c) pursuant to the selection of a
substitute index shall be made in the sole, absolute, and final discretion of
the board or retirement board, as applicable, and shall not be subject to
challenge by any member or beneficiary. In no event shall the Legislature be
constrained or limited in amending the system or increasing the benefits of
members under the system, nor shall the board or retirement board, as
applicable, be constrained from supporting any such change to the system,
notwithstanding the effect of any such change upon the actuarial surplus of the
system and the ability of the board or retirement board, as applicable, to
declare future cost-of-living adjustments.
(13) The Legislature finds and declares that there exists in this state a
pressing need to attract and retain qualified and dedicated public school
employees and that one of the factors prospective public school employees
consider when seeking or continuing public school employment is the retirement
system and benefits the employment provides. The Legislature further finds that
over the past decades, as reflected by the Medical Price Index published by the
United States Department of Labor, the cost of medical care, including the cost
of medications and insurance coverages, has increased at a rate in excess of
that by which the Consumer Price Index - All Urban Consumers has increased. The
Legislature further finds and declares that there accordingly exists a need to
adjust the amount of retirement benefits paid to retired public school
employees in order to assist them in meeting the increased cost of medical
care. Therefor, in addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1) through (12) of this section, commencing on October 3, 2001,
and on October 3 of every year thereafter, a medical cost-of-living adjustment
shall be paid to any annuitant who became a member prior to July 1, 2016, and
has been paid an annuity from the retirement system for at least ten years
through the October 3 adjustment date. The cost-of-living adjustment shall be
paid in the form of a supplemental annuity providing monthly payments equal to
the amount which results when (a) the fraction, not to exceed one, that results
when the annuitant's years of creditable service at his or her retirement date
is divided by twenty, is multiplied by (b) the product of ten dollars times the
number of years, including attained one-half years, that such annuitant has
received annuity payments from the retirement system through the October 3
adjustment date. The supplemental annuity being paid to an annuitant shall
increase by ten dollars on October 3 of each subsequent year to reflect the
additional year of annuity payments to the annuitant until the total amount of
the supplemental annuity is two hundred fifty dollars. In no event shall the
medical cost-of-living adjustment for any annuitant pursuant to this subsection
result in the payment of a supplemental annuity exceeding two hundred fifty
dollars per month. The supplemental annuity paid to an annuitant pursuant to
this subsection shall cease at the death of the annuitant regardless of the
form of retirement annuity being paid to the annuitant at the time of his or
her death.
Sec. 15. Section 79-9,106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-25-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
79-9,106 (1) Upon the death of a member who has not yet retired and who
has twenty years or more of creditable service, the member's primary
beneficiary, as designated by the member in writing on forms provided by the
system, shall receive a survivorship annuity in accordance with subdivision (1)
of section 79-9,101 if the primary beneficiary is (a) the member's spouse or
(b) one other designated beneficiary whose attained age in the calendar year of
the member's death is no more than ten years less than the attained age of the
member in such calendar year. The amount of such actuarially equivalent annuity
shall be calculated using the attained ages of the member and the beneficiary
and be based on the annuity earned to the date of the member's death without
reduction due to any early commencement of benefits. Within ninety sixty days
from the date of the member's death, if the member has not previously filed
with the administrator of the retirement system a form requiring that only the
survivorship annuity be paid, the beneficiary may request to receive in a lump
sum an amount equal to the member's accumulated contributions. If prior to the
member's death, the member files with the administrator of the retirement
system a form requiring that the beneficiary receive a lump-sum settlement in
lieu of the survivorship annuity, the beneficiary shall receive, in lieu of the
survivorship annuity, a lump-sum settlement in an amount equal to the member's
accumulated contributions notwithstanding any other provision of this section.
(2) Upon the death of a member who has not yet retired and who has less
than twenty years of creditable service or upon the death of a member who has
not yet retired and who has twenty years or more of creditable service but
whose beneficiary does not meet the criteria in subsection (1) of this section,
a lump sum in an amount equal to the member's accumulated contributions shall
be paid pursuant to section 79-9,119.
(3) A lump-sum death benefit paid pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of
this section, other than the member's estate, that is an eligible distribution
may be distributed in the form of a direct transfer to a retirement plan
eligible to receive such transfer under the provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(4) For any member whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2007, while
performing qualified military service as defined in section 414(u) of the
Internal Revenue Code, the member's beneficiary shall be entitled to any
additional death benefit that would have been provided, other than the accrual
of any benefit relating to the period of qualified military service. The
additional death benefit shall be determined as if the member had returned to
employment with the school district and such employment had terminated on the
date of the member's death.
Sec. 16. Section 79-9,117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-9,117 (1)(a) Until September 1, 2024, the board of trustees shall
establish a comprehensive preretirement planning program for school employees
who are members of the retirement system. The program shall provide information
and advice regarding the many changes members face upon retirement, including,
but not limited to, changes in physical and mental health, housing, family
life, leisure activity, and retirement income.
(b) Beginning September 1, 2024, the retirement board shall establish
sessions as provided in section 84-1511 for school employees who are members of
the retirement system.
(2) The preretirement planning program shall be available to all members.
(3) The preretirement planning program shall include information on the
federal and state income tax consequences of the various annuity or retirement
benefit options available to the member, information on social security
benefits, information on various local, state, and federal government programs
and programs in the private sector designed to assist elderly persons, and
information and advice the board of trustees or retirement board, as
applicable, deems valuable in assisting members in the transition from public
employment to retirement.
(4) The board of trustees or retirement board, as applicable, shall work
with any governmental agency, including political subdivisions or bodies whose
services or expertise may enhance the development or implementation of the
preretirement planning program.
(5) The costs of the preretirement planning program shall be charged back
to the retirement system.
(6) An employer shall provide each member leave with pay to attend up to
two preretirement planning programs or the equivalent of up to sixteen hours of
preretirement planning programs. For purposes of this subsection, leave with
pay means a day off paid by an employer and does not mean vacation, sick,
personal, or compensatory time. A member may choose to attend a program more
than twice, but such leave shall be at the expense of the member and shall be
at the discretion of the employer. A member shall not be entitled to attend
more than one preretirement planning program per fiscal year prior to actual
election of retirement.
(7) A nominal registration fee may be charged to each person attending a
preretirement planning program to cover the costs for meals, meeting rooms, or
other expenses incurred under such program.
Sec. 17. Section 79-9,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-9,118 No employee shall be authorized to participate in the retirement
system unless the employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in
the United States. The employing public school and the school employee shall
maintain at least one of the following documents, which shall be unexpired , if
-26-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
applicable to the particular document or which has an expiration date that has
been extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security or the
United States Citizenship and Immigration Services so that such document is
still valid, to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the
United States as of the employee's date of hire, and, beginning September 1,
2024, produce any such document so maintained upon request of the retirement
board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems:
(1) A state-issued driver's license;
(2) A state-issued identification card;
(3) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(4) (3) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(5) (4) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(6) (5) A United States passport;
(7) (6) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(8) (7) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(9) (8) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(10) (9) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar
document;
(11) (10) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(12) (11) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(13) (12) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved (a) until
September 1, 2024, by the board of trustees and (b) beginning September 1,
2024, by the retirement board.
Sec. 18. Section 81-2014, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2014 For purposes of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act:
(1)(a) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the aggregate
amounts expected to be received under different forms of payment or to be
received at an earlier retirement age than the normal retirement age.
(b) For an officer hired before July 1, 2017, the determinations shall be
based on the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table reflecting sex-distinct factors
blended using seventy-five percent of the male table and twenty-five percent of
the female table. An interest rate of eight percent per annum shall be
reflected in making the determinations until such percent is amended by the
Legislature.
(c) For an officer hired on or after July 1, 2017, or rehired on or after
July 1, 2017, after termination of employment and being paid a retirement
benefit or taking a refund of contributions, the determinations shall be based
on a unisex mortality table and an interest rate specified by the board. Both
the mortality table and the interest rate shall be recommended by the actuary
and approved by the board following an actuarial experience study, a benefit
adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The mortality table, interest rate, and
actuarial factors in effect on the officer's retirement date will be used to
calculate actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such interest rate
may be, but is not required to be, equal to the assumed rate of return;
(2) Board means the Public Employees Retirement Board;
(3)(a)(i) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the member
for personal services performed during the plan year. Compensation does not
include insurance premiums converted into cash payments, reimbursement for
expenses incurred, fringe benefits, per diems, or bonuses for services not
actually rendered, including, but not limited to, early retirement inducements,
cash awards, and severance pay, except for retroactive salary payments paid
pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and grievance settlements.
Compensation includes overtime pay, member retirement contributions, and
amounts contributed by the member to plans under sections 125 and 457 of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 or any other section of
the code which defers or excludes such amounts from income.
(ii) For any officer employed on or prior to January 4, 1979, compensation
includes compensation for unused sick leave or unused vacation leave converted
to cash payments.
(iii) For any officer employed after January 4, 1979, and prior to July 1,
2016, compensation does not include compensation for unused sick leave or
unused vacation leave converted to cash payments and includes compensation for
unused holiday compensatory time and unused compensatory time converted to cash
payments.
(iv) For any officer employed on or after July 1, 2016, compensation does
not include compensation for unused sick leave, unused vacation leave, unused
holiday compensatory time, unused compensatory time, or any other type of
unused leave, compensatory time, or similar benefits, converted to cash
payments.
(b) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 shall be
disregarded. For an employee who was a member of the retirement system before
the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995, the limitation on
compensation shall not be less than the amount which was allowed to be taken
into account under the retirement system as in effect on July 1, 1993;
(4) Creditable service means service granted pursuant to section 81-2034
-27-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
and all service rendered while a contributing member of the retirement system.
Creditable service includes working days, sick days, vacation days, holidays,
and any other leave days for which the officer is paid regular wages except as
specifically provided in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act. Creditable
service does not include eligibility and vesting credit nor service years for
which member contributions are withdrawn and not repaid;
(5) Current benefit means the initial benefit increased by all adjustments
made pursuant to the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act;
(6) DROP means the deferred retirement option plan as provided in section
81-2041;
(7) DROP account means an individual DROP participant's defined
contribution account under section 414(k) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(8) DROP period means the amount of time the member elects to participate
in DROP which shall be for a period not to exceed five years from and after the
date of the member's DROP election;
(9) Eligibility and vesting credit means credit for years, or a fraction
of a year, of participation in a Nebraska government plan for purposes of
determining eligibility for benefits under the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement
Act. Such credit shall be used toward the vesting percentage pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 81-2031 but shall not be included as years of service
in the benefit calculation;
(10) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(11) Initial benefit means the retirement benefit calculated at the time
of retirement;
(12) Officer means law enforcement officer as defined in section 81-1401
and as provided for in sections 81-2001 to 81-2009, but does not include a
noncertified conditional officer as defined in section 81-1401;
(13) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on July 1 and
ending on June 30 of the following year;
(14) Regular interest means interest fixed at a rate equal to the daily
treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities, as published by the
Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that applies on July 1 of each
year, which may be credited monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually as
the board may direct;
(15) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the deferral of
distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions pursuant to
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued
thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a member
who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who attained
seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020, and prior to
January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who attained
seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-three years of
age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who attained
seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(16) Retirement application means the form approved and provided by the
retirement system for acceptance of a member's request for either regular or
disability retirement;
(17) Retirement date means (a) the first day of the month following the
date upon which a member's request for retirement is received on a retirement
application if the member is eligible for retirement and has terminated
employment or (b) the first day of the month following termination of
employment if the member is eligible for retirement and has filed an
application but has not yet terminated employment;
(18) Retirement system or system means the Nebraska State Patrol
Retirement System as provided in the act;
(19) Service means employment as a member of the Nebraska State Patrol and
shall not be deemed to be interrupted by (a) temporary or seasonal suspension
of service that does not terminate the employee's employment, (b) leave of
absence authorized by the employer for a period not exceeding twelve months,
(c) leave of absence because of disability, or (d) military service, when
properly authorized by the board. Service does not include any period of
disability for which disability retirement benefits are received under
subsection (1) of section 81-2025;
(20) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the member on the
date of the member's death if married for at least one year prior to death or
if married on the date of the member's retirement or (b) the spouse or former
spouse of the member if survivorship rights are provided under a qualified
domestic relations order filed with the board pursuant to the Spousal Pension
Rights Act. The spouse or former spouse shall supersede the spouse married to
the member on the date of the member's death as provided under a qualified
domestic relations order. If the benefits payable to the spouse or former
spouse under a qualified domestic relations order are less than the value of
benefits entitled to the surviving spouse, the spouse married to the member on
the date of the member's death shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of
-28-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
the benefits; and
(21)(a) (21) Termination of employment occurs on the date on which the
Nebraska State Patrol determines that the officer's employer-employee
relationship with the patrol is dissolved. The Nebraska State Patrol shall
notify the board of the date on which such a termination has occurred.
(b) Termination of employment does not include ceasing employment with the
Nebraska State Patrol if the officer returns to regular employment with the
Nebraska State Patrol or another agency of the State of Nebraska and there are
less than one hundred twenty days between the date when the employee's
employer-employee relationship ceased and the date when the employer-employee
relationship commenced with the Nebraska State Patrol or another state agency.
Termination of employment does not occur upon an officer's participation in
DROP pursuant to section 81-2041.
(c) It is the responsibility of the employer that is involved in the
termination of employment to notify the board of such change in employment and
provide the board with such information as the board deems necessary.
(d) If the board determines that termination of employment has not
occurred and a retirement benefit has been paid to a member of the retirement
system pursuant to section 81-2026, the board shall require the member who has
received such benefit to repay the benefit to the retirement system unless the
board determines that all or any portion of such benefit was the result of an
inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such benefit would create a
significant hardship.
Sec. 19. Section 81-2016, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2016 (1) Every member of the Nebraska State Patrol who was employed by
the State of Nebraska as such, on September 7, 1947, and every person employed
as a member of such patrol thereafter, shall be a member of the system, except
for those members of the Nebraska State Patrol who elected pursuant to section
60-1304 to remain members of the State Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska.
(2) No employee shall be authorized to participate in the retirement
system provided for in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act unless the
employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United
States. The employing state agency and the employee shall maintain at least one
of the following documents, which shall be unexpired , if applicable to the
particular document or which has an expiration date that has been extended by
the United States Department of Homeland Security or the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services so that such document is still valid, to
demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States
as of the employee's date of hire and produce any such document so maintained
upon request of the board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
board.
(3) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a member may
apply to the board for eligibility and vesting credit for years of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by section
414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. During the years of participation in the
other Nebraska governmental plan, the employee must have been a full-time
employee, as defined in the Nebraska governmental plan in which the credit was
earned.
(4) Any officer who qualifies for membership pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section may not be disqualified from membership in the retirement system
solely because such officer also maintains separate employment which qualifies
the officer for membership in another public retirement system, nor may
membership in this retirement system disqualify such an officer from membership
in another public retirement system solely by reason of separate employment
which qualifies such officer for membership in this retirement system.
(5) Information necessary to determine membership shall be provided by the
Nebraska State Patrol.
(6) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the
assessment and granting of eligibility and vesting credit.
Sec. 20. Section 84-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1301 For purposes of the State Employees Retirement Act, unless the
-29-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
context otherwise requires:
(1)(a) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the aggregate
amounts expected to be received under different forms of an annuity payment.
(b) For an employee hired prior to January 1, 2018, the mortality
assumption used for purposes of converting the member cash balance account
shall be the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table using a unisex rate that is
fifty percent male and fifty percent female. For purposes of converting the
member cash balance account attributable to contributions made prior to January
1, 1984, that were transferred pursuant to the act, the 1994 Group Annuity
Mortality Table for males shall be used.
(c) For an employee hired on or after January 1, 2018, or rehired on or
after January 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a
retirement benefit or taking a refund of contributions, the mortality
assumption used for purposes of converting the member cash balance account
shall be a unisex mortality table that is recommended by the actuary and
approved by the board following an actuarial experience study, a benefit
adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The mortality table and actuarial factors
in effect on the member's retirement date will be used to calculate the
actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit;
(2) Annuity means equal monthly payments provided by the retirement system
to a member or beneficiary under forms determined by the board beginning the
first day of the month after an annuity election is received in the office of
the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems or the first day of the month
after the employee's termination of employment, whichever is later. The last
payment shall be at the end of the calendar month in which the member dies or
in accordance with the payment option chosen by the member;
(3) Annuity start date means the date upon which a member's annuity is
first effective and shall be the first day of the month following the member's
termination or following the date the application is received by the board,
whichever is later;
(4) Cash balance benefit means a member's retirement benefit that is equal
to an amount based on annual employee contribution credits plus interest
credits and, if vested, employer contribution credits plus interest credits and
dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section
84-1319;
(5)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the member
for personal services performed during the plan year. Compensation does not
include insurance premiums converted into cash payments, reimbursement for
expenses incurred, fringe benefits, per diems, or bonuses for services not
actually rendered, including, but not limited to, early retirement inducements,
cash awards, and severance pay, except for retroactive salary payments paid
pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation and grievance settlements.
Compensation includes overtime pay, member retirement contributions, and
amounts contributed by the member to plans under sections 125, 403(b), and 457
of the Internal Revenue Code or any other section of the code which defers or
excludes such amounts from income.
(b) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section 401(a)
(17) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be disregarded. For an employee who was
a member of the retirement system before the first plan year beginning after
December 31, 1995, the limitation on compensation shall not be less than the
amount which was allowed to be taken into account under the retirement system
as in effect on July 1, 1993;
(6) Date of disability means the date on which a member is determined to
be disabled by the board;
(7) Defined contribution benefit means a member's retirement benefit from
a money purchase plan in which member benefits equal annual contributions and
earnings pursuant to section 84-1310 and, if vested, employer contributions and
earnings pursuant to section 84-1311;
(8) Disability means an inability to engage in any substantially gainful
activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment
which was initially diagnosed or became disabling while the member was an
active participant in the plan and which can be expected to result in death or
to be of long-continued and indefinite duration;
(9) Employee means any person or officer employed by the State of Nebraska
whose compensation is paid out of state funds or funds controlled or
administered by a state department through any of its executive or
administrative officers when acting exclusively in their respective official,
executive, or administrative capacities and any employee of the State Board of
Agriculture who is a member of the state retirement system on July 1, 1982.
Employee does not include (a) judges as defined in section 24-701, (b) members
of the Nebraska State Patrol, except for those members of the Nebraska State
Patrol who elected pursuant to section 60-1304 to remain members of the State
Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, (c) employees of the
University of Nebraska, (d) employees of the state colleges, (e) employees of
community colleges, (f) employees of the Department of Labor employed prior to
July 1, 1984, and paid from funds provided pursuant to Title III of the federal
Social Security Act or funds from other federal sources, except that if the
contributory retirement plan or contract let pursuant to section 48-609, as
such section existed prior to January 1, 2018, is terminated, such employees
shall become employees for purposes of the State Employees Retirement Act on
the first day of the first pay period following the termination of such
contributory retirement plan or contract, (g) employees of the State Board of
Agriculture who are not members of the state retirement system on July 1, 1982,
-30-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(h) the Nebraska National Guard air and army technicians, (i) persons who are
required to participate in the School Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska pursuant to section 79-920, except that those persons so required
and actively contributing to the State Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska as of March 4, 2022, shall continue as members of the State
Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, or (j) employees of the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education who are eligible for and
have elected to become members of a qualified retirement program approved by
the commission which is commensurate with retirement programs at the University
of Nebraska. Any individual appointed by the Governor may elect not to become a
member of the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska;
(10) Employee contribution credit means an amount equal to the member
contribution amount required by section 84-1308;
(11) Employer contribution credit means an amount equal to the employer
contribution amount required by section 84-1309;
(12) Final account value means the value of a member's account on the date
the account is either distributed to the member or used to purchase an annuity
from the plan, which date shall occur as soon as administratively practicable
after receipt of a valid application for benefits, but no sooner than forty-
five days after the member's termination;
(13) Five-year break in service means five consecutive one-year breaks in
service;
(14) Full-time employee means an employee who is employed to work one-half
or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period;
(15) Fund means the State Employees Retirement Fund created by section
84-1309;
(16) Guaranteed investment contract means an investment contract or
account offering a return of principal invested plus interest at a specified
rate. For investments made after July 19, 1996, guaranteed investment contract
does not include direct obligations of the United States or its
instrumentalities, bonds, participation certificates or other obligations of
the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage
Corporation, or the Government National Mortgage Association, or collateralized
mortgage obligations and other derivative securities. This subdivision shall
not be construed to require the liquidation of investment contracts or accounts
entered into prior to July 19, 1996;
(17) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated service
subject to retirement contributions;
(18) Interest credit rate means the greater of (a) five percent or (b) the
applicable federal mid-term rate, as published by the Internal Revenue Service
as of the first day of the calendar quarter for which interest credits are
credited, plus one and one-half percent, such rate to be compounded annually;
(19) Interest credits means the amounts credited to the employee cash
balance account and the employer cash balance account at the end of each day.
Such interest credit for each account shall be determined by applying the daily
portion of the interest credit rate to the account balance at the end of the
previous day. Such interest credits shall continue to be credited to the
employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance account after a
member ceases to be an employee, except that no such credit shall be made with
respect to the employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance
account for any day beginning on or after the member's date of final account
value. If benefits payable to the member's surviving spouse or beneficiary are
delayed after the member's death, interest credits shall continue to be
credited to the employee cash balance account and the employer cash balance
account until such surviving spouse or beneficiary commences receipt of a
distribution from the plan;
(20) Member cash balance account means an account equal to the sum of the
employee cash balance account and, if vested, the employer cash balance account
and dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section
84-1319;
(21) One-year break in service means a plan year during which the member
has not completed more than five hundred hours of service;
(22) Participation means qualifying for and making the required deposits
to the retirement system during the course of a plan year;
(23) Part-time employee means an employee who is employed to work less
than one-half of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period;
(24) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on January 1 and
ending on December 31;
(25) Prior service means service before January 1, 1964;
(26) Regular interest means the rate of interest earned each calendar year
commencing January 1, 1975, as determined by the retirement board in conformity
with actual and expected earnings on the investments through December 31, 1984;
(27) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the deferral of
distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions pursuant to
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued
thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a member
who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who attained
seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020, and prior to
January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who attained
-31-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-three years of
age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who attained
seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with the State of Nebraska; and
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(28) Required contribution means the deduction to be made from the
compensation of employees as provided in section 84-1308;
(29) Retirement means qualifying for and accepting the retirement benefit
granted under the State Employees Retirement Act after terminating employment;
(30) Retirement application means the form approved and provided by the
retirement system for acceptance of a member's request for either regular or
disability retirement;
(31) Retirement board or board means the Public Employees Retirement
Board;
(32) Retirement date means (a) the first day of the month following the
date upon which a member's request for retirement is received on a retirement
application if the member is eligible for retirement and has terminated
employment or (b) the first day of the month following termination of
employment if the member is eligible for retirement and has filed an
application but has not yet terminated employment;
(33) Retirement system means the State Employees Retirement System of the
State of Nebraska;
(34) Service means the actual total length of employment as an employee
and shall not be deemed to be interrupted by (a) temporary or seasonal
suspension of service that does not terminate the employee's employment, (b)
leave of absence authorized by the employer for a period not exceeding twelve
months, (c) leave of absence because of disability, or (d) military service,
when properly authorized by the retirement board. Service does not include any
period of disability for which disability retirement benefits are received
under section 84-1317;
(35) State department means any department, bureau, commission, or other
division of state government not otherwise specifically defined or exempted in
the act, the employees and officers of which are not already covered by a
retirement plan;
(36) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the member on the
date of the member's death or (b) the spouse or former spouse of the member if
survivorship rights are provided under a qualified domestic relations order
filed with the board pursuant to the Spousal Pension Rights Act. The spouse or
former spouse shall supersede the spouse married to the member on the date of
the member's death as provided under a qualified domestic relations order. If
the benefits payable to the spouse or former spouse under a qualified domestic
relations order are less than the value of benefits entitled to the surviving
spouse, the spouse married to the member on the date of the member's death
shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of the benefits;
(37)(a) (37) Termination of employment occurs on the date on which the
agency which employs the member determines that the member's employer-employee
relationship with the State of Nebraska is dissolved. The agency which employs
the member shall notify the board of the date on which such a termination has
occurred.
(b) Termination of employment does not occur if an employee whose
employer-employee relationship with the State of Nebraska is dissolved enters
into an employer-employee relationship with the same or another agency of the
State of Nebraska and there are less than one hundred twenty days between the
date when the employee's employer-employee relationship ceased with the state
and the date when the employer-employee relationship commenced with the same or
another agency.
(c) It is the responsibility of the employer that is involved in the
termination of employment to notify the board of such change in employment and
provide the board with such information as the board deems necessary.
(d) If the board determines that termination of employment has not
occurred and a retirement benefit has been paid to a member of the retirement
system pursuant to section 84-1321, the board shall require the member who has
received such benefit to repay the benefit to the retirement system unless the
board determines that all or any portion of such benefit was the result of an
inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such benefit would create a
significant hardship; and
(38) Vesting credit means credit for years, or a fraction of a year, of
participation in another Nebraska governmental plan for purposes of determining
vesting of the employer account.
Sec. 21. Section 84-1307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1307 (1) The membership of the retirement system shall be composed of
all persons who are or were employed by the State of Nebraska and who maintain
an account balance with the retirement system.
(2) The following employees of the State of Nebraska are authorized to
participate in the retirement system: (a) All permanent full-time employees who
have attained the age of eighteen years shall begin participation in the
retirement system upon employment; and (b) all permanent part-time employees
who have attained the age of eighteen years may exercise the option to begin
participation in the retirement system within the first thirty days of
employment. An employee who exercises the option to begin participation in the
-32-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
retirement system pursuant to this section shall remain in the retirement
system until his or her termination of employment or retirement, regardless of
any change of status as a permanent or temporary employee.
(3) No employee shall be authorized to participate in the retirement
system provided for in the State Employees Retirement Act unless the employee
is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United States. The
employing state agency and the employee shall maintain at least one of the
following documents, which shall be unexpired , if applicable to the particular
document or which has an expiration date that has been extended by the United
States Department of Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services so that such document is still valid, to demonstrate
United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States as of the
employee's date of hire and produce any such document so maintained upon
request of the retirement board or the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement
Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
retirement board.
(4) For purposes of this section, (a) permanent full-time employees
includes employees of the Legislature or Legislative Council who work one-half
or more of the regularly scheduled hours during each pay period of the
legislative session and (b) permanent part-time employees includes employees of
the Legislature or Legislative Council who work less than one-half of the
regularly scheduled hours during each pay period of the legislative session.
(5)(a) Within the first one hundred eighty days of employment, a full-time
employee may apply to the board for vesting credit for years of participation
in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by section 414(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code. During the years of participation in the other Nebraska
governmental plan, the employee must have been a full-time employee, as defined
in the Nebraska governmental plan in which the credit was earned. The board may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the assessment and
granting of vesting credit.
(b) If the contributory retirement plan or contract let pursuant to
section 48-609, as such section existed prior to January 1, 2018, is
terminated, employees of the Department of Labor who are active participants in
such contributory retirement plan or contract on the date of termination of
such plan or contract shall be granted vesting credit for their years of
participation in such plan or contract.
(6) Any employee who qualifies for membership in the retirement system
pursuant to this section may not be disqualified for membership in the
retirement system solely because such employee also maintains separate
employment which qualifies the employee for membership in another public
retirement system, nor may membership in this retirement system disqualify such
an employee from membership in another public retirement system solely by
reason of separate employment which qualifies such employee for membership in
this retirement system.
(7) State agencies shall ensure that employees authorized to participate
in the retirement system pursuant to this section shall enroll and make
required contributions to the retirement system immediately upon becoming an
employee. Information necessary to determine membership in the retirement
system shall be provided by the employer.
Sec. 22. Section 84-1322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1322 (1) Prior to January 1, 2020, except as otherwise provided in this
section, a member of the retirement system who has a five-year break in service
shall upon reemployment be considered a new employee with respect to the State
Employees Retirement Act and shall not receive credit for service prior to his
or her reemployment date.
(2)(a) A member who ceases to be an employee before becoming eligible for
retirement under section 84-1317 and again becomes a permanent full-time or
permanent part-time state employee prior to having a five-year break in service
shall immediately be reenrolled in the retirement system and resume making
contributions. For purposes of vesting employer contributions made prior to and
after reentry into the retirement system under subsection (3) of section
84-1321, years of participation include years of participation prior to such
employee's original termination. For a member who is not vested and has
-33-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
received a termination benefit pursuant to section 84-1321, the years of
participation prior to such employee's original termination shall be limited in
a ratio equal to the amount that the member repays divided by the termination
benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 84-1321. This subsection shall apply
whether or not the person was a state employee on April 20, 1986, or July 17,
1986.
(b) The reemployed member may repay the value of, or a portion of the
value of, the termination benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 84-1321. A
reemployed member who elects to repay all or a portion of the value of the
termination benefit withdrawn pursuant to section 84-1321 shall repay the
actual earnings on such value. Repayment of the termination benefit shall
commence within three years after reemployment and shall be completed within
five years after reemployment or prior to termination of employment, whichever
occurs first, through (i) direct payments to the retirement system, (ii)
installment payments made pursuant to a binding irrevocable payroll deduction
authorization made by the member, (iii) an eligible rollover distribution as
provided under the Internal Revenue Code, or (iv) a direct rollover
distribution made in accordance with section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(c) The value of the member's forfeited employer account or employer cash
balance account, as of the date of forfeiture, shall be restored in a ratio
equal to the amount of the benefit that the member has repaid divided by the
termination benefit received. The employer account or employer cash balance
account shall be restored first out of the current forfeiture amounts and then
by additional employer contributions.
(3) For a member who retired pursuant to section 84-1317 and becomes a
permanent full-time employee or permanent part-time employee with the state
more than one hundred twenty days after his or her retirement date, the member
shall continue receiving retirement benefits. Such a retired member or a
retired member who received a lump-sum distribution of his or her benefit shall
be considered a new employee as of the date of reemployment and shall not
receive credit for any service prior to the member's retirement for purposes of
the act.
(4) A member who is reinstated as an employee pursuant to a grievance or
appeal of his or her termination by the state shall be a member upon
reemployment and shall not be considered to have a break in service for such
period of time that the grievance or appeal was pending.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2020, if a contributing member of the retirement
system ceases to be an employee and returns to service in any capacity with the
state prior to having a one-hundred-twenty-day break in service, the member:
(a) Shall not be deemed to have had a bona fide separation of service;
(b) Shall be immediately reenrolled in:
(i) The defined contribution benefit if the member was contributing to the
defined contribution benefit prior to ceasing employment; or
(ii) The cash balance benefit in which the member was participating prior
to ceasing employment if the member was contributing to the cash balance
benefit prior to ceasing employment;
(c) Shall immediately resume making contributions;
(d) Shall make up any missed contributions based upon services rendered
and compensation received;
(e) Shall have all distributions from the retirement system canceled; and
(f) Shall repay the gross distributions from the retirement system unless
the board determines that all or any portion of such gross distributions were
the result of an inadvertent benefit overpayment and repayment of such gross
distributions would create a significant hardship.
(6)(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, if a contributing member of the
retirement system ceases to be an employee and returns to permanent full-time
or permanent part-time service in any capacity with the state after having a
one-hundred-twenty-day break in service, the member:
(i) Shall be immediately reenrolled in:
(A) The defined contribution benefit if the member was contributing to the
defined contribution benefit prior to ceasing employment; or
(B) The cash balance benefit in which the member was participating prior
to ceasing employment if the member was contributing to the cash balance
benefit prior to ceasing employment;
(ii) Shall immediately resume making contributions;
(iii) Shall continue receiving any annuity elected after the member ceased
employment and before the member was reemployed; and
(iv) Shall be prohibited from taking any distributions from the retirement
system until the employee again terminates employment with the state.
(b) For the purposes of vesting employer contributions made prior to and
after reentry into the retirement system, the member's years of participation
prior to the date the member originally ceased employment and the years of
participation after the member is reenrolled in the retirement system shall be
included as years of participation, except that if the member is not vested on
the date the member originally ceased employment and has taken a distribution,
the years of participation prior to the date the member originally ceased
employment shall be limited in a ratio equal to the value of the distribution
that the member repays divided by the total value of the distribution taken as
described in subdivision (6)(c) of this section.
(c) A reemployed member may repay all or a portion of the value of a
distribution except for an annuity elected after the member ceased employment
and before the member was reemployed. Repayment of such a distribution shall
-34-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
commence within three years after reemployment and shall be completed within
five years after reemployment or prior to the member again ceasing employment,
whichever occurs first, through (i) direct payments to the retirement system,
(ii) installment payments made pursuant to a binding irrevocable payroll
deduction authorization made by the member, (iii) an eligible rollover
distribution as provided under the Internal Revenue Code, or (iv) a direct
rollover distribution made in accordance with section 401(a)(31) of the
Internal Revenue Code. If the member fails to repay all of the value of such a
distribution prior to the member again ceasing employment, the member shall be
forever barred from repaying the value of such a distribution taken between the
periods of employment. The value of the member's forfeited employer account or
employer cash balance account, as of the date of forfeiture, shall be restored
in a ratio equal to the amount of the distribution repaid by the member divided
by the amount of the distribution taken. The employer account or employer cash
balance account shall be restored first out of the current forfeiture amounts
and then by additional employer contributions.
Sec. 23. Section 84-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1502 (1) Within thirty days after its appointment, the Public Employees
Retirement Board shall meet and select a chairperson and secretary. Thereafter,
the chairperson and the secretary shall be elected in January of each year.
(2) The board shall meet upon call of the chairperson, upon the call of
the vice-chairperson, or upon the request of three members of the board filed
with the board office. Meetings of the board shall be held in this state and
may be held by telecommunication equipment if the requirements of the Open
Meetings Act are met.
(3) The members of the board, except the state investment officer, shall
be paid seventy-five dollars per diem for attendance at any meeting of the
board or for any travel to or from any meeting of the board if such travel
occurs on a different day than a board meeting. All , and all members shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their
duties as board members, including mileage, as provided in sections 81-1174 to
81-1177.
Sec. 24. Section 84-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1504 (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board, on behalf of the state,
may contract with any individual to defer a portion of such individual's
compensation or with the Legislative Council to defer any other amount that the
Legislative Council agrees to credit to an individual's account pursuant to
section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) The compensation to be deferred at the election of the individual and
any other amount credited on behalf of such individual by the Legislative
Council shall not exceed the total compensation to be received by the
individual from the employer or exceed the limits established by the Internal
Revenue Code for such a plan.
(3) The deferred compensation program shall serve in addition to but not
be a part of any existing retirement or pension system provided for state or
county employees or any other benefit program.
(4) Any compensation deferred at the election of the individual under such
a deferred compensation plan shall continue to be included as regular
compensation for the purpose of computing the retirement, pension, or social
security contributions made or benefits earned by any employee.
(5) Any sum so deferred shall not be included in the computation of any
federal or state taxes withheld on behalf of any such individual.
(6) The state, the board, the state investment officer, the agency, or the
county shall not be responsible for any investment results entered into by the
individual in the deferred compensation agreement.
(7) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit, restrict, alter,
amend, invalidate, or nullify any deferred compensation plan previously
instituted by any instrumentality or agency of the State of Nebraska, and any
such plan is hereby authorized and approved.
(8) No employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state
shall be authorized to participate in a deferred compensation plan unless the
employee is a United States citizen or is lawfully present in the United
States. The employing state agency or political subdivision of the State of
Nebraska and the employee shall maintain at least one of the following
documents, which shall be unexpired , if applicable to the particular document
or which has an expiration date that has been extended by the United States
Department of Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services so that such document is still valid, to demonstrate
United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States as of the
employee's date of hire and produce any such document so maintained upon
request of the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems:
(a) A state-issued driver's license;
(b) A state-issued identification card;
(c) A state-issued motor vehicle learner's permit;
(d) (c) A certified copy of a birth certificate or delayed birth
certificate issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United States;
(e) (d) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad issued by the United States
Department of State;
(f) (e) A United States passport;
(g) (f) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
-35-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
(h) (g) A United States Certificate of Naturalization;
(i) (h) A United States Certificate of Citizenship;
(j) (i) A tribal certificate of Native American blood or similar document;
(k) (j) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Employment
Authorization Document, Form I-766;
(l) (k) A United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Permanent
Resident Card, Form I-551; or
(m) (l) Any other document issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
granting employment authorization in the United States and approved by the
Public Employees Retirement Board.
(9) For purposes of this section, individual means (a) any state employee,
whether employed on a permanent or temporary basis, full-time or part-time, (b)
a person under contract providing services to the state who is not employed by
the University of Nebraska or any of the state colleges or community colleges
and who has entered into a contract with the state to have compensation
deferred prior to August 28, 1999, and (c) any county employee designated as a
permanent part-time or full-time employee or elected official whose employer
does not offer a deferred compensation plan and who has entered into an
agreement pursuant to section 48-1401.
Sec. 25. Section 84-1511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-1511 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Leave with pay means time off paid by the employer and does not mean
vacation, sick, personal, or compensatory time; and
(b) Session means an in-person training or live-broadcast webinar but does
not include information that can be accessed at any time via electronic means
unless the information accessed via electronic means is: .
(i) In connection with any retirement-planning session provided by the
Public Employees Retirement Board;
(ii) No longer than four hours; and
(iii) Accessed by the member within forty-eight hours after such
information was made available by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(2)(a) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall provide sessions for
state patrol officers, state employees, judges, county employees, and school
employees who are members of the retirement systems established pursuant to the
County Employees Retirement Act, the Judges Retirement Act, the School
Employees Retirement Act, the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act, and the
State Employees Retirement Act. The sessions shall provide information and
advice regarding the many changes members face upon retirement, including, but
not limited to, changes in physical and mental health, housing, family life,
leisure activity, and retirement income.
(b) The sessions shall be available to any member who has satisfied the
vesting requirements under the retirement system in which the member
participates.
(c) The sessions shall include information on the federal and state income
tax consequences of the various annuity or retirement benefit options available
to retirement system members, information on social security benefits,
information on various local, state, and federal government programs and
programs in the private sector designed to assist elderly persons, and
information and advice the board deems valuable in assisting retirement system
members in the transition from public employment to retirement.
(d) Beginning September 1, 2024, as provided pursuant to section 79-9,117,
the board shall also provide the sessions described in this subsection to
school employees who are members of any retirement system established pursuant
to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
(3) The board shall work with the Department of Health and Human Services,
the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services, employee
groups, and any other governmental agency, including political subdivisions or
bodies whose services or expertise may enhance the development or
implementation of the sessions.
(4)(a)(i) Each employer participating in the Retirement System for
Nebraska Counties or the State Employees Retirement System of the State of
Nebraska shall provide each member leave with pay to attend up to three days of
sessions or up to twenty-four hours of sessions.
(ii) Each employer participating in the Nebraska Judges Retirement System,
the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, or the
Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System shall provide each member leave with
pay to attend up to two days of sessions or up to sixteen hours of sessions.
(b) Leave authorized pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this section may
only be used to attend sessions that occur during the employee's normal work
day.
(c) A member may choose to attend more sessions than the leave authorized
pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this section, but leave to attend such
additional sessions shall be at the expense of the member and shall be at the
discretion of the employer.
(5) Funding to cover the expenses of a session shall be charged back to
the retirement fund of each plan for which sessions are provided pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section on a pro rata share based on the number of
members in each plan, except that a nominal registration fee may be charged to
each person attending an in-person training session to cover the costs for
meals, meeting rooms, or other expenses incurred that are incident to an in-
person training session.
-36-

LB295 LB295
2025 2025
Sec. 26. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person
or entity shall include any name, logo, symbol, or similar name, logo, or
symbol of any of the following in a written solicitation for any financial
product or service directed to a member of any Nebraska state public retirement
system without the consent of the Public Employees Retirement Board:
(i) The Public Employees Retirement Board;
(ii) The Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems;
(iii) The School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska;
(iv) Any retirement system for a Class V school;
(v) The Retirement System for Nebraska Counties;
(vi) The State Employees Retirement System;
(vii) The Nebraska Judges Retirement System; or
(viii) The Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System.
(b) Any written solicitation for any financial product or service directed
to a member of any Nebraska state public retirement system shall clearly and
conspicuously state that the person or entity is not sponsored by or affiliated
with the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Nebraska Public Employees
Retirement Systems, or any retirement system specified in subdivisions (1)(a)
(iii) through (viii) of this section. Any such statement shall be in close
proximity to and in larger font size than the first use and any prominent uses
of the name, logo, or symbol in the written solicitation, including on an
envelope or through an envelope window containing the written solicitation.
(2) No person or entity shall use the name of the Public Employees
Retirement Board, the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, any
retirement system specified in subdivisions (1)(a)(iii) through (viii) of this
section, or any name similar to the Public Employees Retirement Board, the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, or any retirement system
specified in subdivisions (1)(a)(iii) through (viii) of this section, in any
written solicitation for any financial product or service directed to any
member of any Nebraska state public retirement system if such use could cause a
reasonable person to be confused, mistaken, or deceived initially or otherwise
as to either of the following:
(a) Any sponsorship, affiliation, connection, or association with the
person who or entity that initiated or sent the written solicitation and the
Public Employees Retirement Board, the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement
Systems, or any retirement system specified in subdivisions (1)(a)(iii) through
(viii) of this section;
(b) Any approval or endorsement of the person who or entity that initiated
or sent the written solicitation by the Public Employees Retirement Board, the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, or any retirement system
specified in subdivisions (1)(a)(iii) through (viii) of this section; or
(c) Any approval or endorsement of any product or service provided or
offered by the person who or entity that initiated or sent the written
solicitation by the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems, or any retirement system specified in
subdivisions (1)(a)(iii) through (viii) of this section.
Sec. 27. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17,
18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, and 28 of this act become operative three
calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative session. The other
sections of this act become operative on their effective date.
Sec. 28. Original sections 23-2320, 42-1102, 79-902, 79-904.01, 79-915,
79-956, 79-978, 79-9,103, 79-9,106, 79-9,117, 79-9,118, 81-2014, 81-2016,
84-1301, 84-1307, 84-1322, 84-1502, 84-1504, and 84-1511, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 4-108, 23-2301, 23-2306, 24-701, and
24-703.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 29. Original section 24-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 30. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-37-